https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Quincy_Adams
John Quincy Adams - Wikipedia
John Quincy Adams From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia This is the latest accepted revision, reviewed on 28 April 2020. Jump to navigation Jump to search "Quincy Adams" redirects here. For other uses, see Quincy Adams (disambiguation). "JQA" redirects here. For other uses, see JQA (disambiguation). 6th president of the United States John Quincy Adams Adams in c. 1843-48, photographed by Mathew Brady 6th President of the United States In office March 4, 1825 – March 4, 1829 Vice President John C. Calhoun Preceded by James Monroe Succeeded by Andrew Jackson 8th United States Secretary of State In office September 22, 1817 – March 4, 1825 President James Monroe Preceded by James Monroe Succeeded by Henry Clay United States Senator from Massachusetts In office March 4, 1803 – June 8, 1808 Preceded by Jonathan Mason Succeeded by James Lloyd Member of the United States House of Representatives from Massachusetts In office March 4, 1831 – February 23, 1848 Preceded by Joseph Richardson Succeeded by Horace Mann Constituency 11th district (1831–1833) 12th district (1833–1843) 8th district (1843–1848) Diplomatic missions 7th United States Minister to the United Kingdom In office June 8, 1815 – May 14, 1817 President James Madison James Monroe Preceded by Jonathan Russell (1812) Succeeded by Richard Rush 1st United States Minister to Russia In office November 5, 1809 – April 28, 1814 President James Madison Preceded by Office established Succeeded by James A. Bayard 1st United States Minister to Prussia In office December 5, 1797 – May 5, 1801 President John Adams Thomas Jefferson Preceded by Office established Succeeded by Henry Wheaton (1835) 3rd United States Minister to the Netherlands In office November 6, 1794 – June 20, 1797 President George Washington John Adams Preceded by William Short Succeeded by William Vans Murray Personal details Born (1767-07-11)July 11, 1767 Braintree, Massachusetts Bay, British America Died February 23, 1848(1848-02-23) (aged 80) Washington, D.C., U.S. Cause of death Stroke Resting place United First Parish Church Political party Federalist (1792–1808) Democratic-Republican (1809–1828) National Republican (1828–1830) Anti-Masonic (1830–1834) Whig (1834–1848)[1] Spouse(s) Louisa Johnson (m. 1797) Children George John Charles Louisa Parents John Adams Abigail Smith Relatives Adams political family Quincy political family Education Harvard University (BA, MA) Signature John Quincy Adams (/ˈkwɪnzi/ (listen);[a] July 11, 1767 – February 23, 1848) was an American statesman, diplomat, lawyer, and diarist who served as the sixth president of the United States from 1825 to 1829. He previously served as the eighth United States Secretary of State from 1817 to 1825. During his long diplomatic and political career, Adams also served as an ambassador, and as a member of the United States Senate and United States House of Representatives representing Massachusetts. He was the eldest son of John Adams, who served as the second US president from 1797 to 1801, and First Lady Abigail Adams. Initially a Federalist like his father, he won election to the presidency as a member of the Democratic-Republican Party, and in the mid-1830s became affiliated with the Whig Party. Born in what is now Quincy, Massachusetts[3] (then part of the town of Braintree), Adams spent much of his youth in Europe, where his father served as a diplomat. After returning to the United States, Adams established a successful legal practice in Boston. In 1794, President George Washington appointed Adams as the U.S. ambassador to the Netherlands, and Adams would serve in high-ranking diplomatic posts until 1801, when Thomas Jefferson took office as president. Federalist leaders in Massachusetts arranged for Adams's election to the United States Senate in 1802, but Adams broke with the Federalist Party over foreign policy and was denied re-election. In 1809, Adams was appointed as the U.S. ambassador to Russia by President James Madison, a member of the Democratic-Republican Party. Adams held diplomatic posts for the duration of Madison's presidency, and he served as part of the American delegation that negotiated an end to the War of 1812. In 1817, newly-elected President James Monroe selected Adams as his Secretary of State. In that role, Adams negotiated the Adams–Onís Treaty, which provided for the American acquisition of Florida. He also helped formulate the Monroe Doctrine, which became a key tenet of U.S. foreign policy. The 1824 presidential election was contested by Adams, Andrew Jackson, William H. Crawford, and Henry Clay, all of whom were members of the Democratic-Republican Party. As no candidate won a majority of the electoral vote, the House of Representatives held a contingent election to determine the president, and Adams won that contingent election with the support of Clay. As president, Adams called for an ambitious agenda that included federally-funded infrastructure projects, the establishment of a national university, and engagement with the countries of Latin America, but many of his initiatives were defeated in Congress. During Adams's presidency, the Democratic-Republican Party polarized into two major camps: one group, known as the National Republican Party, supported President Adams, while the other group, known as the Democratic Party, was led by Andrew Jackson. The Democrats proved to be more effective political organizers than Adams and his National Republican supporters, and Jackson decisively defeated Adams in the 1828 presidential election. Rather than retiring from public service, Adams won election to the House of Representatives, where he would serve from 1831 to his death in 1848. He joined the Anti-Masonic Party in the early 1830s before becoming a member of the Whig Party, which united those opposed to President Jackson. During his time in Congress, Adams became increasingly critical of slavery and of the Southern leaders whom he believed controlled the Democratic Party. He was particularly opposed to the annexation of Texas and the Mexican–American War, which he saw as a war to extend slavery. He also led the repeal of the "gag rule", which had prevented the House of Representatives from debating petitions to abolish slavery. Historians generally concur that Adams was one of the greatest diplomats and secretaries of state in American history. They typically rank him as a mediocre president who had an ambitious agenda but could not get it passed by Congress. Contents 1 Early life, education, and early career 2 Early political career (1793–1817) 2.1 Early diplomatic career and marriage 2.2 U.S. Senator from Massachusetts 2.3 Minister to Russia 2.4 Treaty of Ghent and ambassador to Britain 3 Secretary of State (1817–1825) 3.1 Adams–Onís Treaty 3.2 Monroe Doctrine 4 1824 presidential election 5 Presidency (1825–1829) 5.1 Inauguration 5.2 Administration 5.3 Domestic affairs 5.3.1 Ambitious agenda 5.4 Formation of political parties 5.4.1 Tariff of 1828 5.4.2 Indian policy 5.5 Foreign affairs 5.5.1 Trade and claims 5.5.2 Latin America 5.6 1828 presidential election 6 Later congressional career (1830–1848) 6.1 Jackson administration, 1830–1836 6.2 Van Buren and Tyler administrations, 1837–1843 6.3 Opposition to the Mexican-American War, 1844–1848 6.4 Anti-slavery movement 6.5 Smithsonian Institution 6.6 Death 7 Personal life 7.1 Personality 8 Legacy 8.1 Historical reputation 8.2 Memorials 8.3 Film and television 9 See also 10 Notes 11 References 11.1 Works cited 12 Further reading 12.1 Secondary sources 12.2 Primary sources 13 External links Early life, education, and early career[edit] Coat of Arms of John Quincy Adams Adams' birthplace in Quincy, Massachusetts John Quincy Adams was born on July 11, 1767, to John and Abigail Adams (née Smith) in a part of Braintree, Massachusetts that is now Quincy.[4] He was named for his mother's maternal grandfather, Colonel John Quincy, after whom Quincy, Massachusetts, is named.[5] Young Adams was educated by private tutors – his cousin James Thaxter and his father's law clerk, Nathan Rice.[6][page needed] He soon began to exhibit his literary skills, and in 1779 he initiated a diary which he kept until just before he died in 1848.[7] Until the age of ten, Adams grew up on the family farm in Braintree, largely in the care of his mother. Though frequently absent due to his participation in the American Revolution, John Adams maintained a correspondence with his son, encouraging him to read works by authors such as Thucydides and Hugo Grotius.[8] With his father's encouragement, Adams would also translate classical authors such as Virgil, Horace, Plutarch, and Aristotle.[9] In 1778, Adams and his father departed for Europe, where John Adams would serve as part of American diplomatic missions in France and the Netherlands.[10] During this period, Adams studied French, Greek, and Latin, and attended several schools, including Leiden University.[11] In 1781, Adams traveled to Saint Petersburg, Russia, where he served as the secretary of American diplomat Francis Dana.[12] He returned to the Netherlands in 1783, and accompanied his father to Great Britain in 1784.[13] Though Adams enjoyed Europe, he and his family decided he needed to return to the United States to complete his education and eventually launch a political career.[14] Adams returned to the United States in 1785 and earned admission as a member of the junior class of Harvard College the following year. He was elected to Phi Beta Kappa and excelled academically, graduating second in his class in 1787.[15] After graduating from Harvard, he studied law with Theophilus Parsons in Newburyport, Massachusetts from 1787 to 1789.[16] Adams initially opposed the ratification of the United States Constitution, but he ultimately came to accept the document, and in 1789 his father was elected as the first Vice President of the United States.[17] In 1790, Adams opened his own legal practice in Boston. Despite some early struggles, he experienced moderate success as an attorney and was able to establish his financial independence from his parents.[18] Early political career (1793–1817)[edit] Early diplomatic career and marriage[edit] John Quincy Adams, age 29 Adams initially avoided becoming directly involved in politics, instead focusing on building his legal career. In 1791, he wrote a series of pseudonymously-published essays in which he argued that Britain provided a better governmental model than France. Two years later, he published another series of essays in which he attacked Edmond-Charles Genêt, a French diplomat who sought to undermine President George Washington's policy of neutrality in the French Revolutionary Wars.[19] In 1794, Washington appointed Adams as the U.S. ambassador to the Netherlands; Adams considered declining the role but ultimately took the position at the advice of his father.[20] While abroad, Adams continued to urge neutrality, arguing that the United States would benefit economically by staying out of the ongoing French Revolutionary Wars.[21] His chief duty as the ambassador to the Netherlands was to secure and maintain the loans that were essential to U.S. finances. On his way to the Netherlands, he met with John Jay, who was then negotiating the Jay Treaty with Great Britain. Adams supported the Jay Treaty, but it proved unpopular with many in the United States, contributing to a growing partisan split between the Federalist Party of Alexander Hamilton and the Democratic-Republican Party of Thomas Jefferson.[22] Adams spent the winter of 1795–96 in London, where he met Louisa Catherine Johnson, the second daughter of American merchant Joshua Johnson. In April 1796, Louisa accepted Adams's proposal of marriage. Adams's parents disapproved of his decision to marry a woman who had grown up in England, but he informed his parents that he would not reconsider his decision.[23] Adams initially wanted to delay his wedding to Louisa until he returned to the United States, but they were married in All Hallows-by-the-Tower in July 1797.[24][b] Shortly after the wedding, Joshua Johnson fled England to escape his creditors, and Adams did not receive the dowry that Johnson had promised him, much to the embarrassment of Louisa. Nonetheless, Adams noted in his own diary that he had no regrets about his decision to marry Louisa.[26] Gilbert Stuart Portrait of Louisa Adams (1821–26) In 1796, Washington appointed Adams as the U.S. ambassador to Portugal.[27] Later in that same year, John Adams defeated Jefferson in the 1796 presidential election. When the elder Adams became president, he appointed his son as the U.S. ambassador to Prussia.[28] Though concerned that his appointment would be criticized as nepotistic, Adams accepted the position and traveled to the Prussian capital of Berlin with his wife and his younger brother, Thomas Boylston Adams. The State Department charged Adams with developing commercial relations with Prussia and Sweden, but President Adams also asked his son to write him frequently about affairs in Europe.[29] In 1799, Adams negotiated a new trade agreement between the United States and Prussia, though he was never able to complete an agreement with Sweden.[30] He frequently wrote to family members in the United States, and in 1801 his letters about the Prussian region of Silesia were published in a book titled Letters on Silesia.[31] In the 1800 presidential election, Jefferson defeated John Adams, and both Adams and his son left office in early 1801.[32] U.S. Senator from Massachusetts[edit] On his return to the United States, Adams re-established a legal practice in Boston, and in April 1802 he was elected to the Massachusetts Senate.[33] In November of that same year he ran unsuccessfully for the United States House of Representatives.[34] In February 1803, the Massachusetts legislature elected Adams to the United States Senate. Though somewhat reluctant to affiliate with any political party, Adams joined the Federalist minority in Congress.[35] Like his Federalist colleagues, he opposed the impeachment of Associate Justice Samuel Chase, an outspoken supporter of the Federalist Party.[36] Adams had strongly opposed Jefferson's 1800 presidential candidacy, but he gradually became alienated from the Federalist Party. His disaffection was driven by the party's declining popularity, disagreements over foreign policy, and Adams's hostility to Timothy Pickering, a Federalist Party leader whom Adams viewed as overly favorable to Britain. Unlike other New England Federalists, Adams supported the Jefferson administration's Louisiana Purchase and generally favored expansionist policies.[37] Adams was the lone Federalist in Congress to vote for the Non-importation Act of 1806, which was designed to punish Britain for its attacks on American shipping in the midst of the ongoing Napoleonic Wars. Adams became increasingly frustrated with the unwillingness of other Federalists to condemn British actions, including impressment, and he moved closer to the Jefferson administration. After Adams supported the Embargo Act of 1807, the Federalist-controlled Massachusetts legislature elected Adams's successor several months before the end of his term and Adams resigned from the Senate shortly thereafter.[38] While a member of the Senate, Adams served as a professor of logic at Brown University[39] and as the Boylston Professor of Rhetoric and Oratory at Harvard University. Adams's devotion to classical rhetoric shaped his response to public issues, and he would remain inspired by those rhetorical ideals long after the neo-classicalism and deferential politics of the founding generation were eclipsed by the commercial ethos and mass democracy of the Jacksonian Era. Many of Adams's idiosyncratic positions were rooted in his abiding devotion to the Ciceronian ideal of the citizen-orator "speaking well" to promote the welfare of the polis.[40] He was also influenced by the classical republican ideal of civic eloquence espoused by British philosopher David Hume.[41] Adams adapted these classical republican ideals of public oratory to the American debate, viewing its multilevel political structure as ripe for "the renaissance of Demosthenic eloquence." His Lectures on Rhetoric and Oratory (1810) looks at the fate of ancient oratory, the necessity of liberty for it to flourish, and its importance as a unifying element for a new nation of diverse cultures and beliefs. Just as civic eloquence failed to gain popularity in Britain, in the United States interest faded in the second decade of the 19th century, as the "public spheres of heated oratory" disappeared in favor of the private sphere.[42] Minister to Russia[edit] After resigning from the Senate, Adams was ostracized by Massachusetts Federalist leaders, but he declined Democratic-Republican entreaties to seek office.[43] In 1809, he argued before the Supreme Court of the United States in the case of Fletcher v. Peck, and the Supreme Court ultimately agreed with Adams's argument that the Constitution's Contract Clause prevented the state of Georgia from invalidating a land sale to out-of-state companies.[44] Later that year, President James Madison appointed Adams as the first United States Minister to Russia in 1809. Though Adams had only recently broken with the Federalist Party, his support of Jefferson's foreign policy had earned him goodwill with the Madison Administration.[45] Adams was well-qualified for the role after his experiences in Europe generally and Russia specifically.[46] 1815 US passport issued by John Quincy Adams at London After a difficult passage through the Baltic Sea, Adams arrived in the Russian capital of St. Petersburg in October 1809. He quickly established a productive working relationship with Russian official Nikolay Rumyantsev and eventually befriended Tsar Alexander I of Russia. Adams continued to favor American neutrality between France and Britain in the midst of the Napoleonic War.[47] Louisa was initially distraught at the prospect of living in Russia, but she became a popular figure at the Russian court.[48] From his diplomatic post, Adams observed the French Emperor Napoleon's invasion of Russia, which ended in defeat for the French.[49] In February 1811, Adams was nominated by President Madison as an Associate Justice of the United States Supreme Court.[50] The nomination was unanimously confirmed by the Senate, but Adams declined the seat, preferring a career in politics and diplomacy, so Joseph Story took the seat instead.[51] Treaty of Ghent and ambassador to Britain[edit] Adams had long feared that the United States would enter a war it could not win against Britain, and by early 1812 he saw such a war as inevitable due to the constant British attacks on American shipping and the British practice of impressment. In mid-1812, the United States declared war against Britain, beginning the War of 1812. Tsar Alexander attempted to mediate the conflict between Britain and the United States, and President Madison appointed Adams, Secretary of the Treasury Albert Gallatin, and Federalist Senator James A. Bayard to a delegation charged with negotiating an end to the war. Gallatin and Bayard arrived in St. Petersburg in July 1813, but the British declined Tsar Alexander's offer of mediation. Hoping to commence the negotiations at another venue, Adams left Russia in April 1814.[52] Negotiations finally began in mid-1814 in Ghent, where Adams, Gallatin, and Bayard were joined by two additional American delegates, Jonathan Russell and former Speaker of the House Henry Clay.[53] Adams, the nominal head of the delegation, got along well with Gallatin, Bayard, and Russell, but he occasionally clashed with Clay.[54] The British delegation initially treated the United States as a defeated power, demanding the creation of an Indian barrier state from American territory near the Great Lakes. The American delegation unanimously rejected this offer, and their negotiating position was bolstered by the American victory in the Battle of Plattsburgh.[55] By November 1814, the government of Lord Liverpool decided to seek an end to hostilities with the U.S. on the basis of status quo ante bellum. Adams and his fellow commissioners had hoped for similar terms, despite the fact that a return to the status quo would mean the continuation of British practice of impressment. The treaty was signed on December 24, 1814. The United States did not gain any concessions from the treaty but could boast that it had survived a war against the strongest power in the world. Following the signing of the treaty, Adams traveled to Paris, where he witnessed first-hand the Hundred Days of Napoleon's restoration.[56] In May 1815, Adams learned that President Madison had appointed him as the U.S. ambassador to Britain.[57] With the aid of Clay and Gallatin, Adams negotiated a limited trade agreement with Britain. Following the conclusion of the trade agreement, much of Adams's time as ambassador was spent helping stranded American sailors and prisoners of war.[58] In pursuit of national unity, newly-elected President James Monroe decided a Northerner would be optimal for the position of Secretary of State, and he chose the respected and experienced Adams for the role.[59] Having spent several years in Europe, Adams returned to the United States in August 1817.[58] Secretary of State (1817–1825)[edit] See also: Presidency of James Monroe Adams portrait – Gilbert Stuart, 1818 Adams served as Secretary of State throughout Monroe's eight-year presidency, from 1817 to 1825. Many of his successes as secretary, such as the convention of 1818 with Great Britain, the Transcontinental Treaty with Spain, and the Monro Doctrine, were not preplanned, but came about in response to unexpected events. Adams wanted to delay American recognition of the newly independent republics of Latin America that were breaking with Spanish imperialism, so as not to risk a war with Spain and its European allies. However, Andrew Jackson's military campaign in Florida, and Henry Clay's threats in Congress, forced Spain to cut a deal, which Adam negotiated successfully. Biographer James Lewis says, "He managed to play the cards that he had been dealt – cards that he very clearly had not wanted – in ways that forced the Spanish cabinet to recognize the weakness of its own hand." [60] Apart from the Monroe doctrine, his last four years the Secretary of State were less successful, since he was absorbed in his presidential campaign and refused to make compromises with other nations that might have weakened his candidacy; The result was a small scale trade war, but a successful election to the White House. Taking office in the aftermath of the War of 1812, Adams thought that the country had been fortunate in avoiding territorial losses, and he prioritized avoiding another war with a European power, particularly Britain.[61] He also sought to avoid exacerbating sectional tensions, which had been a major issue for the country during the War of 1812.[62][c] One of the major challenges confronting Adams was how to respond to the power vacuum in Latin America that arose from Spain's weakness following the Peninsular War.[64] In addition to his foreign policy role, Adams held several domestic duties, including overseeing the 1820 Census.[65] Monroe and Adams agreed on most of the major foreign policy issues: both favored neutrality in the Latin American wars of independence, peace with Great Britain, denial of a trade agreement with the French, and expansion, peacefully if possible, into the North American territories of the Spanish Empire.[66] The president and his secretary of state developed a strong working relationship, and while Adams often influenced Monroe's policies, he respected that Monroe made the final decisions on major issues.[67] Monroe met regularly with his five-person cabinet, which initially consisted of Adams, Secretary of the Treasury William H. Crawford, Secretary of War John C. Calhoun, Secretary of the Navy Benjamin Crowninshield, and Attorney General William Wirt.[68] Adams developed a strong respect for Calhoun but believed that Crawford was unduly focused on succeeding Monroe in 1824.[69] During his time as ambassador to Britain, Adams had begun negotiations over several contentious issues that had not been solved by the War of 1812 or the Treaty of Ghent. In 1817, the two countries agreed to the Rush–Bagot Treaty, which limited naval armaments on the Great Lakes. Negotiations between the two powers continued, resulting in the Treaty of 1818, which defined the Canada–United States border west of the Great Lakes. The boundary was set at the 49th parallel to the Rocky Mountains, while the territory to the west of the mountains, known as Oregon Country, would be jointly occupied. The agreement represented a turning point in United Kingdom–United States relations, as the U.S. turned its attention to its southern and western borders and British fears over American expansionism waned.[70] Adams–Onís Treaty[edit] In the Adams–Onís Treaty, the United States acquired Florida and set the western border of the 1803 Louisiana Purchase When Adams took office, Spanish possessions bordered the United States to the South and West. In the South, Spain retained control of Florida, which the U.S. had long sought to purchase. Spain struggled to control the Indian tribes active in Florida, and some of those tribes raided U.S. territory. In the West, New Spain bordered the territory acquired by the U.S. in the Louisiana Purchase, but no clear boundary had been established between U.S. and Spanish territory.[61] After taking office, Adams began negotiations with Luis de Onís, the Spanish minister to the United States, for the purchase of Florida and the settlement of a border between the U.S. and New Spain. The negotiations were interrupted by an escalation of the Seminole War, and in December 1818 Monroe ordered General Andrew Jackson to enter Florida and retaliate against Seminoles that had raided Georgia. Exceeding his orders, Jackson captured the Spanish outposts of St. Marks and Pensacola and executed two Englishmen. While the rest of the cabinet was outraged by Jackson's actions, Adams defended them as necessary to the country's self-defense, and he eventually convinced Monroe and most of the cabinet to support Jackson.[71] Adams informed Spain that Jackson had been compelled to act by Spain's failure to police its own territory, and he advised Spain to either secure the region or sell it to the United States.[72] The British, meanwhile, declined to risk their recent rapprochement with the United States, and did not make a major diplomatic issue out of Jackson's execution of two British nationals.[73] Negotiations between Spain and the United States continued, and Spain agreed to cede Florida. The determination of the western boundary of the United States proved more difficult. American expansionists favored setting the border at the Rio Grande, but Spain, intent on protecting its colony of Mexico from American encroachment, insisted on setting the boundary at the Sabine River. At Monroe's direction, Adams agreed to the Sabine River boundary, but he insisted that Spain cede its claims on Oregon Country.[74] Adams was deeply interested in establishing American control over the Oregon Country, partly because he believed that control of that region would spur trade with Asia. The acquisition of Spanish claims to the Pacific Northwest also allowed the Monroe administration to pair the acquisition of Florida, which was chiefly sought by Southerners, with territorial gains favored primarily by those in the North.[75] After extended negotiations, Spain and the United States agreed to the Adams–Onís Treaty, which was ratified in February 1821.[71] Adams was deeply proud of the treaty, though he privately was concerned by the potential expansion of slavery into the newly-acquired territories.[76] In 1824, the Monroe administration would further bolster U.S. claims to Oregon by reaching the Russo-American Treaty of 1824, which set the southern border of Russian Alaska at the parallel 54°40′ north.[77] Monroe Doctrine[edit] As the Spanish Empire continued to fracture during Monroe's second term, Adams and Monroe became increasingly concerned that the "Holy Alliance" of Prussia, Austria, and Russia would seek to bring Spain's erstwhile colonies under their control. In 1822, following the conclusion of the Adams–Onís Treaty, the Monroe administration recognized the independence of several Latin American countries, including Argentina and Mexico. In 1823, British Foreign Secretary George Canning suggested that the U.S. and Britain should work together to preserve the independence of these fledgling republics. The cabinet debated whether or not to accept the offer, but Adams opposed it. Instead, Adams urged Monroe to publicly declare U.S. opposition to any European attempt to colonize or re-take control of territory in the Americas, while also committing the U.S. to neutrality with respect to European affairs. In his December 1823 annual message to Congress, Monroe laid out the Monroe Doctrine, which was largely built upon Adams's ideas.[78] In issuing the Monroe Doctrine, the United States displayed a new level of assertiveness in international relations, as the doctrine represented the country's first claim to a sphere of influence. It also marked the country's shift in psychological orientation away from Europe and towards the Americas. Debates over foreign policy would no longer center on relations with Britain and France, but would instead focus on western expansion and relations with Native Americans.[79] The doctrine became one of the foundational principles of U.S. foreign policy.[78] 1824 presidential election[edit] 1824 presidential election results Immediately upon becoming Secretary of State, Adams emerged as one of Monroe's most likely successors, as the last three presidents had all served in the role at some point before taking office. As the 1824 election approached, Henry Clay, John C. Calhoun (who later dropped out of the race), and William H. Crawford appeared to be Adams's primary competition to succeed Monroe.[80] Crawford favored state sovereignty and a strict constructionist view of the Constitution, while Clay, Calhoun, and Adams embraced federally-funded internal improvements, high tariffs, and the Second Bank of the United States, which was also known as the national bank.[81] Because the Federalist Party had nearly collapsed in the aftermath of the War of 1812, all of the major presidential candidates were members of the Democratic-Republican Party.[82] Adams felt that his own election as president would vindicate his father, while also allowing him to pursue an ambitious domestic policy. Though he lacked the charisma of his competitors, Adams was widely respected and benefited from the lack of other prominent Northern political leaders.[83] Adams's top choice for the role of vice president was General Andrew Jackson; Adams noted that "the Vice-Presidency was a station in which [Jackson] could hang no one, and in which he would need to quarrel with no one."[84] However, as the 1824 election approached, Jackson jumped into the race for president.[82] While the other candidates based their candidacies on their long tenure as congressmen, ambassadors, or members of the cabinet, Jackson's appeal rested on his military service, especially in the Battle of New Orleans.[85] The congressional nominating caucus had decided upon previous Democratic-Republican presidential nominees, but it had become largely discredited by 1824. Candidates were instead nominated by state legislatures or nominating conventions, and Adams received the endorsement of the New England legislatures.[86] The regional strength of each candidate played an important role in the election; Adams was popular in New England, Clay and Jackson were strong in the West, and Jackson and Crawford competed for the South.[87] 1825 contingent presidential election vote distribution States for Adams States for Jackson States for Crawford Connecticut Illinois Kentucky Louisiana Maine Maryland Massachusetts Missouri New Hampshire New York Ohio Rhode Island Vermont Alabama Indiana Mississippi New Jersey Pennsylvania South Carolina Tennessee Delaware Georgia North Carolina Virginia Total: 13 (54%) Total: 7 (29%) Total: 4 (17%) In the 1824 presidential election, Jackson won a plurality in the Electoral College, taking 99 of the 261 electoral votes, while Adams won 84, Crawford won 41, and Clay took 37. Calhoun, meanwhile, won a majority of the electoral vote for vice president.[87] Adams nearly swept the electoral votes of New England and won a majority of the electoral vote in New York, but he won a total of just six electoral votes from the slave states. Most of Jackson's support came from slave-holding states, but he also won New Jersey, Pennsylvania, and some electoral votes from the Northwest.[88] As no candidate won a majority of the electoral vote, the House was required to hold contingent election under the terms of the Twelfth Amendment. The House would decide among the top three electoral vote winners, with each state's delegation having one vote; thus, unlike his three rivals, Clay was not eligible to be elected by the House.[87] Adams knew that his own victory in the contingent election would require the support of Clay, who wielded immense influence in the House of Representatives.[89] Though they were quite different in temperament and had clashed in the past, Adams and Clay shared similar views on national issues. By contrast, Clay viewed Jackson as a dangerous demagogue, and he was unwilling to support Crawford due to the latter's health issues.[90] Adams and Clay met prior to the contingent election, and Clay agreed to support Adams in the election.[91] Adams also met with Federalists such as Daniel Webster, promising that he would not deny governmental positions to members of their party.[92] On February 9, 1825, Adams won the contingent election on the first ballot, taking 13 of the 24 state delegations. Adams won the House delegations of all the states in which he or Clay had won a majority of the electoral votes, as well as the delegations of Illinois, Louisiana, and Maryland.[91] Adams's victory made him the first child of a president to serve as president himself.[d] After the election, many of Jackson's supporters claimed that Adams and Clay had reached a "Corrupt Bargain" in which Adams promised Clay the position of Secretary of State in return for Clay's support.[91] Presidency (1825–1829)[edit] Main article: Presidency of John Quincy Adams Inauguration[edit] Adams was inaugurated on March 4, 1825. He took the oath of office on a book of constitutional law, instead of the more traditional Bible.[93] In his inaugural address, he adopted a post-partisan tone, promising that he would avoid party-building and politically-motivated appointments. He also proposed an elaborate program of "internal improvements": roads, ports, and canals. Though some worried about the constitutionality of such federal projects, Adams argued that the General Welfare Clause provided for broad constitutional authority. While his predecessors had engaged in projects like the building of the National Road, Adams promised that he would ask Congress to authorize many more such projects.[94] Administration[edit] The Adams Cabinet Office Name Term President John Quincy Adams 1825–1829 Vice President John C. Calhoun 1825–1829 Secretary of State Henry Clay 1825–1829 Secretary of Treasury Richard Rush 1825–1829 Secretary of War James Barbour 1825–1828 Peter B. Porter 1828–1829 Attorney General William Wirt 1825–1829 Secretary of the Navy Samuel L. Southard 1825–1829 Adams presided over a harmonious and productive cabinet that he met with on a weekly basis.[95] Like Monroe, Adams sought a geographically-balanced cabinet that would represent the various party factions, and he asked the members of the Monroe cabinet to remain in place for his own administration.[96] Samuel L. Southard of New Jersey stayed on as Secretary of the Navy, William Wirt kept his post of Attorney General,[97] and John McLean of Ohio continued to serve as the Postmaster General, an important position that was not part of the cabinet.[98] Adams's first choices for Secretary of War and Secretary of the Treasury were Andrew Jackson and William Crawford, respectively, but each declined to serve in the administration. Adams instead selected James Barbour of Virginia, a prominent supporter of Crawford, to lead the War Department. Leadership of the Treasury Department went to Richard Rush of Pennsylvania, who would become a prominent advocate of internal improvements and protective tariffs within the administration.[99] Adams chose Henry Clay as Secretary of State, angering those who believed that Clay had offered his support in the 1824 election for the most prestigious position in the cabinet.[100] Though Clay would later regret accepting the position since it reinforced the "Corrupt Bargain" accusation, Clay's strength in the West and interest in foreign policy made him a natural choice for the top cabinet position.[101] Domestic affairs[edit] Ambitious agenda[edit] John Quincy Adams, George Peter Alexander Healy, 1858 In his 1825 annual message to Congress,[102] Adams presented a comprehensive and ambitious agenda. He called for major investments in internal improvements as well as the creation of a national university, a naval academy, and a national astronomical observatory. Noting the healthy status of the treasury and the possibility for more revenue via land sales, Adams argued for the completion of several projects that were in various stages of construction or planning, including a road from Washington to New Orleans.[103] He also proposed the establishment of a Department of the Interior as a new cabinet-level department that would preside over these internal improvements.[104] Adams hoped to fund these measures primarily through Western land sales, rather than increased taxes or public debt.[81] The domestic agenda of Adams and Clay, which would come to be known as the American System, was designed to unite disparate regional interests in the promotion of a thriving national economy.[105] Adams's programs faced opposition from various quarters. Many disagreed with his broad interpretation of the constitution and preferred that power be concentrated in state governments rather than the federal government. Others disliked interference from any level of government and were opposed to central planning.[106] Some in the South feared that Adams was secretly an abolitionist and that he sought to suborn the states to the federal government.[107] Most of the president's proposals were defeated in Congress. Adams's ideas for a national university, national observatory, and the establishment of a uniform system of weights and measures never received congressional votes.[108] His proposal for the creation of a naval academy won the approval of the Senate, but was defeated in the House; opponents objected to the naval academy's cost and worried that the establishment of such an institution would "produce degeneracy and corruption of the public morality."[109] Adams's proposal to establish a national bankruptcy law was also defeated.[108] BEP engraved portrait of Adams as president Unlike other aspects of his domestic agenda, Adams won congressional approval for several ambitious infrastructure projects.[110] Between 1824 and 1828, the United States Army Corps of Engineers conducted surveys for a bevy of potential roads, canals, railroads, and improvements in river navigation. Adams presided over major repairs and further construction on the National Road, and shortly after he left office the National Road extended from Cumberland, Maryland to Zanesville, Ohio.[111] The Adams administration also saw the beginning of the Chesapeake and Ohio Canal; the construction of the Chesapeake and Delaware Canal and the Louisville and Portland Canal around the falls of the Ohio; the connection of the Great Lakes to the Ohio River system in Ohio and Indiana; and the enlargement and rebuilding of the Dismal Swamp Canal in North Carolina.[112] Additionally, the first passenger railroad in the United States, the Baltimore and Ohio Railroad, was constructed during Adams's presidency. Though many of these projects were undertaken by private actors, the government often provided money or land to aid the completion of such projects.[113] Formation of political parties[edit] See also: First Party System and Second Party System General Andrew Jackson In the immediate aftermath of the 1825 contingent election, Jackson was gracious to Adams.[114] Nevertheless, Adams's appointment of Clay rankled Jackson, who received a flood of letters encouraging him to run. In 1825, Jackson accepted the presidential nomination of the Tennessee legislature for the 1828 election.[115] Though he had been close with Adams during Monroe's presidency, Vice President Calhoun was also politically alienated from the president by the appointment of Clay, since that appointment established Clay as the natural heir to Adams.[116] Adams's ambitious December 1825 annual message to Congress further galvanized the opposition, with important figures such as Francis Preston Blair of Kentucky and Thomas Hart Benton of Missouri breaking with the Adams administration.[117] By the end of the first session of the 19th United States Congress, an anti-Adams congressional coalition consisting of Jacksonians (led by Benton and Hugh Lawson White), Crawfordites (led by Martin Van Buren and Nathaniel Macon), and Calhounites (led by Robert Y. Hayne and George McDuffie) had emerged.[118] Aside from Clay, Adams lacked strong supporters outside of the North, and Edward Everett, John Taylor, and Daniel Webster served as his strongest advocates in Congress.[119] Supporters of Adams began calling themselves National Republicans, while supporters of Jackson began calling themselves Democrats.[120] In the press, they were often described as "Adams Men" and "Jackson Men."[121] In the 1826 elections, Adams's opponents picked up seats throughout the country, as allies of Adams failed to coordinate among themselves.[122] Pro-Adams Speaker of the House John Taylor was replaced by Andrew Stevenson, a Jackson supporter;[123] as Adams himself noted, the U.S. had never before seen a Congress that was firmly under the control of political opponents of the president.[124] After the elections, Van Buren and Calhoun agreed to throw their support behind Jackson in 1828, with Van Buren bringing along many of Crawford's supporters.[125] Though Jackson did not articulate a detailed political platform in the same way that Adams did, his coalition was united in opposition to Adams's reliance on government planning.[126] Adams, meanwhile, clung to the hope of a non-partisan nation, and he refused to make full use of the power of patronage to build up his own party structure.[127] Tariff of 1828[edit] During the first half of his administration, Adams avoided taking a strong stand on tariffs, partly because he wanted to avoid alienating his allies in the South and New England.[128] After Jacksonians took power in 1827, they devised a tariff bill designed to appeal to Western states while instituting high rates on imported materials important to the economy of New England. It is unclear whether Van Buren, who shepherded the bill through Congress, meant for the bill to pass, or if he had deliberately designed it in such a way that would force Adams and his allies to oppose it.[129] Regardless, Adams signed the Tariff of 1828, which became known as the "Tariff of Abominations" by opponents. Adams was denounced in the South, and he received little credit for the tariff in the North.[130] Indian policy[edit] See also: Federal Indian Policy Adams sought the gradual assimilation of Native Americans via consensual agreements, a priority shared by few whites in the 1820s. Yet Adams was also deeply committed to the westward expansion of the United States. Settlers on the frontier, who were constantly seeking to move westward, cried for a more expansionist policy that disregarded the concerns of Native Americans. Early in his term, Adams suspended the Treaty of Indian Springs after learning that the Governor of Georgia, George Troup, had forced the treaty on the Muscogee.[131] Adams signed a new treaty with the Muscogee in January 1826 that allowed the Muscogee to stay but ceded most of their land to Georgia. Troup refused to accept its terms, and authorized all Georgian citizens to evict the Muscogee.[132] A showdown between Georgia and the federal government was only averted after the Muscogee agreed to a third treaty.[133] Though many saw Troup as unreasonable in his dealings with the federal government and the Native Americans, the administration's handling of the incident alienated those in the Deep South who favored immediate Indian removal.[134] Foreign affairs[edit] Trade and claims[edit] Secretary of State Henry Clay One of the major foreign policy goals of the Adams administration was the expansion of American trade.[135] His administration reached reciprocity treaties with a number of nations, including Denmark, the Hanseatic League, the Scandinavian countries, Prussia, and the Federal Republic of Central America. The administration also reached commercial agreements with the Kingdom of Hawaii and the Kingdom of Tahiti.[136] Agreements with Denmark and Sweden opened their colonies to American trade, but Adams was especially focused on opening trade with the British West Indies. The United States had reached a commercial agreement with Britain in 1815, but that agreement excluded British possessions in the Western Hemisphere. In response to U.S. pressure, the British had begun to allow a limited amount of American imports to the West Indies in 1823, but U.S. leaders continued to seek an end to Britain's protective Imperial Preference system.[137] In 1825, Britain banned U.S. trade with the British West Indies, dealing a blow to Adams's prestige.[138] The Adams administration negotiated extensively with the British to lift this ban, but the two sides were unable to come to an agreement.[139] Despite the loss of trade with the British West Indies, the other commercial agreements secured by Adams helped expand overall volume of U.S. exports.[140] Latin America[edit] With the exception of an unsuccessful attempt to purchase Texas from Mexico, President Adams did not seek to expand into Latin America or North America.[141] Adams and Clay instead sought engagement with Latin America in order to prevent it from falling under the British Empire's economic influence.[142] As part of this goal, the administration favored sending a U.S. delegation to the Congress of Panama, an 1826 conference of New World republics organized by Simón Bolívar.[143] Clay and Adams hoped that the conference would inaugurate a "Good Neighborhood Policy" among the independent states of the Americas.[144] However, the funding for a delegation and the confirmation of delegation nominees became entangled in a political battle over Adams's domestic policies, with opponents such as Van Buren impeding the process of confirming a delegation.[106] Van Buren saw the Panama Congress as an unwelcome deviation from the more isolationist foreign policy established by President Washington,[144] while many Southerners opposed involvement with any conference attended by delegates of Haiti, a republic that had been established through a slave revolt.[145] Though the U.S. delegation finally won confirmation from the Senate, it never reached the Congress of Panama due to the Senate's delay.[146] 1828 presidential election[edit] Main article: United States presidential election, 1828 1828 presidential election results The Jacksonians formed an effective party apparatus that adopted many modern campaign techniques. Rather than focusing on issues, they emphasized Jackson's popularity and the supposed corruption of Adams and the federal government. Jackson himself described the campaign as a "struggle between the virtue of the people and executive patronage."[147] Adams, meanwhile, refused to adapt to the new reality of political campaigns, and he avoided public functions and refused to invest in pro-administration tools such as newspapers.[148] In early 1827, Jackson was publicly accused of having encouraged his wife, Rachel, to desert her first husband.[149] In response, followers of Jackson attacked Adams's personal life, and the campaign turned increasingly nasty.[150] The Jacksonian press portrayed Adams as an out-of-touch elitist,[151] while pro-Adams newspapers attacked Jackson's past involvement in various duels and scuffles, portraying him as too emotional and impetuous for the presidency. Though Adams and Clay had hoped that the campaign would focus on the American System, it was instead dominated by personalities of Jackson and Adams.[152] Vice President Calhoun joined Jackson's ticket, while Adams turned to Secretary of the Treasury Richard Rush as his running mate.[153] The 1828 election thus marked the first time in U.S. history that a presidential ticket composed of two Northerners faced off against a presidential ticket composed of two Southerners.[154] In the election, Jackson won 178 of the 261 electoral votes and just under 56 percent of the popular vote.[155] Jackson won 50.3 percent of the popular vote in the free states, but 72.6 percent of the vote in the slave states.[156] No future presidential candidate would match Jackson's proportion of the popular vote until Theodore Roosevelt's 1904 campaign, while Adams's loss made him the second one-term president, after his own father.[155] By 1828, only two states did not hold a popular vote for president, and the total number of votes in 1828 election was triple the number of votes in the 1824 election. This increase in votes was due not only to the recent wave of democratization, but also because of increased interest in elections and the growing ability of the parties to mobilize voters.[157] Later congressional career (1830–1848)[edit] Jackson administration, 1830–1836[edit] Adams considered permanently retiring from public life after his 1828 defeat, and he was deeply hurt by the suicide of his son, George Washington Adams, in 1829.[158] He was appalled by many of the Jackson administration's actions, including its embrace of the spoils system.[159] Though they had once maintained a cordial relationship, Adams and Jackson each came to loathe the other in the decades after the 1828 election.[160] Adams grew bored of his retirement and still felt that his career was unfinished, so he ran for and won a seat in the United States House of Representatives in the 1830 elections.[161] His election went against the generally held opinion, shared by his own wife and youngest son, that former presidents should not run for public office.[162] Nonetheless, he would win election to nine terms, serving from 1831 until his death in 1848.[1] Adams and Andrew Johnson are the only former presidents to serve in Congress.[163] After winning election, Adams became affiliated with the Anti-Masonic Party, partly because the National Republican Party's leadership in Massachusetts included many of the former Federalists that Adams had clashed with earlier in his career. The Anti-Masonic Party originated as a movement against Freemasonry, but it developed into the country's first third party and embraced a general program of anti-elitism.[164] Returning to Washington at the age of sixty-four, Adams expected a light workload, but Speaker Andrew Stevenson selected Adams chairman of the Committee on Commerce and Manufactures.[165] Though he identified as a member of the Anti-Masonic Party, Congress was broadly polarized into allies of Jackson and opponents of Jackson, and Adams generally aligned with the latter camp.[166] Stevenson, an ally of Jackson, expected that the committee chairmanship would keep Adams busy defending the tariff even while the Jacksonian majority on the committee would prevent Adams from accruing any real power.[167] As chairman of the committee charged with writing tariff laws, Adams became an important player in the Nullification Crisis, which stemmed largely from Southern objections to the high rates imposed by the Tariff of 1828. South Carolina leaders argued that states could nullify federal laws, and they announced that the federal government would be barred from enforcing the tariff in their state.[168] Adams led passage of the Tariff of 1832, which lowered rates somewhat, but not enough to mollify the South Carolina nullifiers. The crisis was ended when Clay and Calhoun agreed to another tariff bill, the Tariff of 1833, that furthered lower tariff rates. Adams was appalled by the Nullification Crisis's outcome, as he felt that the Southern states had unfairly benefited from challenging federal law.[169] After the crisis, Adams increasingly came to believe that Southerners exercised an undue degree of influence over the federal government, largely through their control of Jackson's Democratic Party.[170] The Anti-Masonic Party nominated Adams in the 1833 Massachusetts gubernatorial election in a four-way race between Adams, the National Republican candidate, the Democratic candidate, and a candidate of the Working Men's Party. The National Republican candidate, John Davis, won 40% of the vote, while Adams finished in second place with 29%. Because no candidate won a majority of the vote, the state legislature decided the election. Rather than seek election by the legislature, Adams withdrew his name from contention, and the legislature selected Davis.[171] Adams was nearly elected to the Senate in 1835 by a coalition of Anti-Masons and National Republicans, but his support for Jackson in a minor foreign policy matter annoyed National Republican leaders enough that they dropped their support for his candidacy.[172] After 1835, Adams never again sought higher office, focusing instead on his service in the House of Representatives.[173] Van Buren and Tyler administrations, 1837–1843[edit] In the mid-1830s, the Anti-Masonic Party, the National Republicans, and other groups opposed to Jackson coalesced into the Whig Party.[174] In the 1836 presidential election Democrats put forward Martin Van Buren, while the Whigs fielded multiple presidential candidates. As he disdained all of the major party contenders for president, Adams did not take part in the campaign; Van Buren won the election.[175] Nonetheless, Adams became aligned with the Whig Party in Congress.[176] Adams generally opposed the initiatives of President Van Buren, long a political adversary, though they maintained a cordial public relationship.[177] The Republic of Texas won its independence from Mexico in the Texas Revolution of 1835–1836. Texas had largely been settled by Americans from the Southern United States, and many of those settlers owned slaves despite an 1829 Mexican law that abolished slavery. Many in the United States and Texas thus favored the admission of Texas into the union as a slave state. Adams considered the issue of Texas to be "a question of far deeper root and more overshadowing branches than any or all others that agitate the country", and he emerged as one of the leading congressional opponents of annexation. Adams had sought to acquire Texas when he served as secretary of state, but he argued that, because Mexico had abolished slavery, the acquisition of Texas would transform the region from a free territory into a slave state. He also feared that the annexation of Texas would encourage Southern expansionists to pursue other potential slave states, including Cuba. Adams's strong stance may have played a role in discouraging Van Buren from pushing for the annexation of Texas during his presidency.[178] Whig nominee William Henry Harrison defeated Van Buren in the 1840 presidential election, and the Whigs gained control of both houses of Congress for the first time. Despite his low regard for Harrison as a person, Adams was enthusiastic about the new Whig administration and the end of the long-standing Democratic dominance of the federal government.[179] However, Harrison died in April 1841 and was succeeded by Vice President John Tyler, a Southerner who, unlike Adams, Henry Clay, and many other prominent Whigs, did not embrace the American System. Adams saw Tyler as an agent of "the slave-driving, Virginia, Jeffersonian school, principled against all improvement." After Tyler vetoed a bill to restore the national bank, Whig congressmen expelled Tyler from the party. Adams was appointed chairman of a special committee that explored impeaching Tyler, and Adams presented a scathing report of Tyler that argued that his actions warranted impeachment. The impeachment process did not move forward, though, in large part because the Whigs did not believe that the Senate would vote to remove Tyler from office.[180] Opposition to the Mexican-American War, 1844–1848[edit] Tyler made the annexation of Texas the main foreign policy priority of the later stages of his administration.[181] He attempted to win ratification of an annexation treaty in 1844, but, to Adams's surprise and relief, the treaty was rejected by the Senate.[182] The annexation of Texas became the central issue of the 1844 presidential election, and Southerners blocked the nomination of Van Buren at the 1844 Democratic National Convention due to the latter's opposition to annexation; the party instead nominated James K. Polk, an acolyte of Andrew Jackson.[183] Though he once again did not take part in the campaigning, Adams was deeply disappointed that Polk defeated his old ally, Henry Clay, in the 1844 election. He attributed the outcome of the election partly to the Liberty Party, a small, abolitionist third party that may have siphoned votes from Clay in the crucial state of New York.[184] After the election, Tyler, whose term would end in March 1845, once again submitted an annexation treaty to Congress.[e] Adams strongly attacked the treaty, arguing that the annexation of Texas would involve the United States in "a war for slavery." Despite Adams's opposition, both houses of Congress approved the treaty, with most Democrats voting for annexation and most Whigs voting against it. Texas thus joined the United States as a slave state in 1845.[186] Adams had served with James K. Polk in the House of Representatives, and Adams loathed the new president, seeing him as another expansionist, pro-slavery Southern Democrat.[187] Adams favored the annexation of the entirety of Oregon Country, a disputed region occupied by both the United States and Britain, and was disappointed when President Polk signed the Oregon Treaty, which divided the land between the two claimants at the 49th parallel.[188] Polk's expansionist aims were centered instead on the Mexican province of Alta California, and he attempted to buy the province from Mexico. The Mexican government refused to sell California or recognize the independence and subsequent American annexation of Texas. Polk deployed a military detachment led by General Zachary Taylor to back up his assertion that the Rio Grande constituted the Southern border of both Texas and the United States. After Taylor's forces clashed with Mexican soldiers north of the Rio Grande, Polk asked for a declaration of war in early 1846, asserting that Mexico had invaded American territory. Though some Whigs questioned whether Mexico had really begun an aggressive war against the United States, both houses of Congress declared war, with the House voting 174-to-14 to approve the declaration. Adams, who believed that Polk was seeking to wage an offensive war in order to extend the institution of slavery, was one of the 14 dissenting votes.[189] After the start of the war, he supported the Wilmot Proviso, an unsuccessful legislative proposal that would have banned slavery in any territory ceded by Mexico.[190] After 1846, ill health increasingly affected Adams, but he continued to oppose the Mexican–American War until his death in 1848.[191] Anti-slavery movement[edit] Main article: John Quincy Adams and abolitionism In the 1830s, slavery emerged as an increasingly polarizing issue in the United States.[192] A longtime opponent of slavery, Adams used his new role in Congress to fight it, and he became the most prominent national leader opposing slavery.[193] After one of his reelection victories, he said that he must "bring about a day prophesied when slavery and war shall be banished from the face of the earth." He wrote in his private journal in 1820:[194] The discussion of this Missouri question has betrayed the secret of their souls. In the abstract they admit that slavery is an evil, they disclaim it, and cast it all upon the shoulder of…Great Britain. But when probed to the quick upon it, they show at the bottom of their souls pride and vainglory in their condition of masterdom. They look down upon the simplicity of a Yankee's manners, because he has no habits of overbearing like theirs and cannot treat negroes like dogs. It is among the evils of slavery that it taints the very sources of moral principle. It establishes false estimates of virtue and vice: for what can be more false and heartless than this doctrine which makes the first and holiest rights of humanity to depend upon the color of the skin? John Quincy Adams during his final hours of life after his collapse in the Capitol. Drawing in pencil by Arthur Joseph Stansbury, digitally restored. In 1836, partially in response to Adams's consistent presentation of citizen petitions requesting the abolition of slavery in the District of Columbia, the House of Representatives imposed a "gag rule" that immediately tabled any petitions about slavery. The rule was favored by Democrats and Southern Whigs but was largely opposed by Northern Whigs like Adams.[195] In late 1836, Adams began a campaign to ridicule slave owners and the gag rule. He frequently attempted to present anti-slavery petitions, often in ways that provoked strong reactions from Southern representatives.[196] Though the gag rule remained in place,[197] the discussion ignited by his actions and the attempts of others to quiet him raised questions of the right to petition, the right to legislative debate, and the morality of slavery. Adams fought actively against the gag rule for another seven years, eventually moving the resolution that led to its repeal in 1844.[198] In 1841, at the request of Lewis Tappan and Ellis Gray Loring, Adams joined the case of United States v. The Amistad. Adams went before the Supreme Court on behalf of African slaves who had revolted and seized the Spanish ship Amistad. Adams appeared on February 24, 1841, and spoke for four hours. His argument succeeded; the Court ruled in favor of the Africans, who were declared free and returned to their homes.[199] Smithsonian Institution[edit] Adams's portrait at the U.S. National Portrait Gallery by George Bingham c. 1850 Adams also became a leading force for the promotion of science. In 1829, British scientist James Smithson died, and he left his fortune for the "increase and diffusion of knowledge." In Smithson's will, he stated that should his nephew, Henry James Hungerford, die without heirs, the Smithson estate would go to the government of the United States to create an "Establishment for the increase & diffusion of Knowledge among men." After the nephew died without heirs in 1835, President Andrew Jackson informed Congress of the bequest, which amounted to about US$500,000 ($75,000,000 in 2008 U.S. dollars after inflation). Adams realized that this might allow the United States to realize his dream of building a national institution of science and learning. Adams thus became Congress's primary supporter of the future Smithsonian Institution.[200] The money was invested in shaky state bonds, which quickly defaulted. After heated debate in Congress, Adams successfully argued to restore the lost funds with interest.[201] Though Congress wanted to use the money for other purposes, Adams successfully persuaded Congress to preserve the money for an institution of science and learning. Congress also debated whether the federal government had the authority to accept the gift, though with Adams leading the initiative, Congress decided to accept the legacy bequeathed to the nation and pledged the faith of the United States to the charitable trust on July 1, 1836.[202] Partly due to Adams's efforts, Congress voted to establish the Smithsonian Institution in 1846. A nonpolitical board of regents was established to lead the institution, which included a museum, art gallery, library, and laboratory.[203] Death[edit] Adams's cenotaph at the Congressional Cemetery John Quincy Adams's original tomb at Hancock Cemetery, across the street from United First Parish Church In 1846, the 78-year-old former president suffered a stroke that left him partially paralyzed. After a few months of rest, he made a full recovery and resumed his duties in Congress. When Adams entered the House chamber, everyone "stood up and applauded."[204] On February 21, 1848, the House of Representatives was discussing the matter of honoring U.S. Army officers who served in the Mexican–American War. Adams had been a vehement critic of the war, and as Congressmen rose up to say, "Aye!" in favor of the measure, he instead yelled, "No!"[205] He rose to answer a question put forth by Speaker of the House Robert Charles Winthrop.[206] Immediately thereafter, Adams collapsed, having suffered a massive cerebral hemorrhage.[207] Two days later, on February 23, he died at 7:20 p.m. with his wife at his side in the Speaker's Room inside the Capitol Building in Washington, D.C.; his only living child, Charles Francis, did not arrive in time to see his father alive. His last words were "This is the last of earth. I am content."[206] His original interment was temporary, in the public vault at the Congressional Cemetery in Washington, D.C. Later, he was interred in the family burial ground in Quincy, Massachusetts, across from the First Parish Church, called Hancock Cemetery. After Louisa's death in 1852, his son had his parents reinterred in the expanded family crypt in the United First Parish Church across the street, next to John and Abigail. Both tombs are viewable by the public. Adams's original tomb at Hancock Cemetery is still there and marked simply "J.Q. Adams".[208] Personal life[edit] See also: Adams political family Adams and Louisa had three sons and a daughter. Their daughter, Louisa, was born in 1811 but died in 1812.[209] They named their first son George Washington Adams (1801–1829) after the first president. This decision upset Adams's mother, and, by her account, his father as well.[210] Both George and their second son, John (1803–1834), led troubled lives and died in early adulthood.[211][212] George, who had long suffered from alcoholism, died in 1829 after going overboard on a steamboat; it is not clear whether he fell or purposely jumped from the boat.[213] John, who ran an unprofitable flour and grist mill owned by his father, died of an unknown illness in 1834.[214] Adams's youngest son, Charles Francis Adams Sr., was an important leader of the "Conscience Whigs", a Northern, anti-slavery faction of the Whig Party.[191] Charles served as the Free Soil Party's vice presidential candidate in the 1848 presidential election and later became a prominent member of the Republican Party.[215] Personality[edit] Presidential Dollar of John Quincy Adams Adams's personality and political beliefs were much like his father's.[216] He always preferred secluded reading to social engagements, and several times had to be pressured by others to remain in public service. Historian Paul Nagel states that, like Abraham Lincoln after him, Adams often suffered from depression, for which he sought some form of treatment in early years. Adams thought his depression was due to the high expectations demanded of him by his father and mother. Throughout his life he felt inadequate and socially awkward because of his depression, and was constantly bothered by his physical appearance.[216] He was closer to his father, whom he spent much of his early life with abroad, than he was to his mother. When he was younger and the American Revolution was going on, his mother told her children what their father was doing, and what he was risking, and because of this Adams grew to greatly respect his father.[216] His relationship with his mother was rocky; she had high expectations of him and was afraid her children might end up dead alcoholics like her brother.[216] His biographer, Nagel, concludes that his mother's disapproval of Louisa Johnson motivated him to marry Johnson in 1797, despite Adams's reservations that Johnson, like his mother, had a strong personality.[216] Though Adams wore a powdered wig in his youth,[217] he abandoned this fashion and became the first president to adopt a short haircut instead of long hair tied in a queue and to regularly wear long trousers instead of knee breeches.[218][219] It has been suggested that John Quincy Adams had the highest I.Q. of any U.S. president.[220][221] Dean Simonton, a professor of psychology at UC Davis, estimated his I.Q. score at 165.[222] Legacy[edit] Historical reputation[edit] Tombs of Presidents John Adams (far left) and John Quincy Adams (right) and their wives Abigail and Louisa, in a family crypt beneath the United First Parish Church Adams is widely regarded as one of the most effective diplomats and secretaries of state in American history,[223][224] but scholars generally rank him as an average president.[225][226] Adams is remembered as a man eminently qualified for the presidency, yet hopelessly weakened in his presidential leadership potential as a result of the election of 1824. Most importantly, Adams is remembered as a poor politician in an era when politics had begun to matter more. He spoke of trying to serve as a man above the "baneful weed of party strife" at the precise moment in history when the Second Party System was emerging with nearly revolutionary force.[163] Biographer and historian William J. Cooper notes that Adams "does not loom large in the American imagination", but that he has received more public attention since the late 20th century due to his anti-slavery stances. Cooper writes that Adams was the first "major public figure" to publicly question whether the United States could remain united so long as the institution of slavery persisted.[223] Historian Daniel Walker Howe writes that Adams's "intellectual ability and courage were above reproach, and his wisdom in perceiving the national interest has stood the test of time."[227] Historians have often included Adams among the leading conservatives of his day.[228][229][230][231] Russell Kirk, however, sees Adams as a flawed conservative who was imprudent in opposing slavery.[228] Memorials[edit] John Quincy Adams Birthplace is now part of Adams National Historical Park and open to the public. Adams House, one of twelve undergraduate residential Houses at Harvard University, is named in honor of John Adams, John Quincy Adams, and other members of the Adams family who were associated with Harvard.[232] In 1870, Charles Francis built the first presidential library in the United States, to honor his father. The Stone Library includes over 14,000 books written in twelve languages. The library is located in the "Old House" at Adams National Historical Park in Quincy, Massachusetts. Adams's middle name of Quincy has been used by several locations in the United States, including the town of Quincy, Illinois. Adams County, Illinois and Adams County, Indiana are also named after Adams. Adams County, Iowa and Adams County, Wisconsin were each named for either John Adams or John Quincy Adams. Some sources contend that in 1843 Adams sat for the earliest confirmed photograph still in existence of a U.S. president, although others maintain that William Henry Harrison had posed even earlier for his portrait, in 1841.[233] The original daguerreotype is in the collection of the National Portrait Gallery of the Smithsonian Institution.[234] Film and television[edit] Adams occasionally is featured in the mass media. In the PBS miniseries The Adams Chronicles (1976), he was portrayed by David Birney, William Daniels, Marcel Trenchard, Steven Grover and Mark Winkworth. He was also portrayed by Anthony Hopkins in the 1997 film Amistad, and again by Ebon Moss-Bachrach and Steven Hinkle in the 2008 HBO television miniseries John Adams; the HBO series received criticism for needless historical and temporal distortions in its portrayal.[235] See also[edit] List of abolitionists List of United States political appointments across party lines List of Presidents of the United States by previous experience List of United States Congress members who died in office (1790–1899) Mendi Bible Quincy Institute for Responsible Statecraft Notes[edit] ^ The Quincy family name was pronounced /ˈkwɪnzi/, as in the name of Quincy, Massachusetts (then called Braintree), where Adams was born. All of the other Quincy place names are locally /ˈkwɪnsi/. Though not accurate, this pronunciation is also commonly used for Adams's middle name.[2] ^ When Adams took office as president in 1825, Louisa became the first First Lady born outside of the United States. In 2017, Melania Trump became the second First Lady born outside of the United States.[25] ^ Adams had been especially concerned by the Hartford Convention, which had been called by anti-war Federalists to discuss their grievances against the Madison administration[63] ^ In 2001, George W. Bush would become the second child of a president to serve as president. ^ Tyler had initially sent the treaty to the Senate; the Constitution provides that a two-thirds vote of the Senate is required to ratify any treaty. After the 1844 election, Tyler asked Congress to approve the treaty via joint resolution, which would require a simple majority vote in both houses of Congress.[185] References[edit] ^ a b "John Quincy Adams; Biographical Directory of the U.S. Congress". Bioguide.congress.gov. Retrieved March 15, 2017. ^ Wead, Doug (2005). The Raising of a President. New York: Atria Books. p. 59. ISBN 0-7434-9726-0. ^ Quincy, Mailing Address: 135 Adams Street. "John Quincy Adams Birthplace - Adams National Historical Park (U.S. National Park Service)". www.nps.gov. Retrieved March 4, 2020. ^ Rettig, Polly M. (April 3, 1978). "John Quincy Adams Birthplace". National Park Service. Retrieved November 1, 2011. ^ Herring, James; Longacre, James Barton (1853). The National Portrait Gallery of Distinguished Americans. D. Rice & A.N. Hart. p. 1. ISBN 0-405-02500-9. ^ Remini 2002 ^ "The Diaries of John Quincy Adams: A Digital Collection". Massachusetts Historical Society. Retrieved October 30, 2011. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 5–8. ^ Richard, Carl (2009). The Golden Age of the Classics in America: Greece Rome and the Antebellum United States. Cambridge, Massachusetts: Harvard University Press. p. 23. ISBN 978-0674032644. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 8–9, 16. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 9, 14–16. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 17–18. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 21–22. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 36–37. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 24–27. ^ Musto, David F. (April 20, 1968). "The Youth of John Quincy Adams". Proceedings of the American Philosophical Society. Philadelphia, Pennsylvania: American Philosophical Society: 273. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 29–30. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 32–33. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 35–36. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 38. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 83–86. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 34, 40–41. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 45–48. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 48–53. ^ Black, Allida (2009). "The First Ladies of the United States of America". The White House Historical Assoc. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 54–55. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 48–49. ^ Edel 2014, p. 83. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 53–56. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 59–60. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 60–61. ^ Edel 2014, p. 89. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 64–66. ^ McCullough 2001, pp. 575–76. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 67–68. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 70–71. ^ "John Quincy Adams Isn't Who You Think He Is". Bloomberg.com. February 8, 2020. Retrieved March 14, 2020. ^ Thompson 1991, pp. 165–181 ^ McCullough 2001, p. 587. ^ Rathbun, Lyon (2000). "The Ciceronian Rhetoric of John Quincy Adams". Rhetorica. 18 (2): 175–215. doi:10.1525/rh.2000.18.2.175. ^ Hume, David (1742). Essays and Treatises on Several Subjects. London: T. Cadell. pp. 99–110. ^ Potkay, Adam S. (1999). "Theorizing Civic Eloquence in the Early Republic: the Road from David Hume to John Quincy Adams". Early American Literature. 34 (2): 147–70. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 85. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 87–88. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 96–97. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 88–89. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 91–92. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 90, 94–95. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 92–93. ^ McMillion, Barry J.; Rutkus, Denis Steven (July 6, 2018). "Supreme Court Nominations, 1789 to 2017: Actions by the Senate, the Judiciary Committee, and the President" (PDF). Washington, D.C.: Congressional Research Service. Retrieved August 26, 2018. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 106–107. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 109–110. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 112–113. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 112, 114–115, 119. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 116–118. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 289–302 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 127–128. ^ a b Kaplan 2014, pp. 307–11, 318–20 ^ Edel 2014, pp. 116–17. ^ James E. Lewis Jr, John Quincy Adams: Policymaker for the Union (2001) p 56. ^ a b Kaplan 2014, pp. 321–22. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 143–145. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 145–146. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 107–09. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 147–148. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 327–28. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 151–152. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 153–154. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 154–155. ^ Remini 2002, pp. 48, 51–53. ^ a b Kaplan 2014, pp. 333–37, 348. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 163–164. ^ Howe 2007, p. 106 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 164–166. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 108–109 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 167–168. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 112–115 ^ a b Kaplan 2014, pp. 380–85. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 115–116 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 364–67. ^ a b Howe 2007, pp. 203–204 ^ a b Parsons 2009, pp. 70–72. ^ Hargreaves 1985, p. 24 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 208–209. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 20–21 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 79–86. ^ a b c Kaplan 2014, pp. 386–389. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 213. ^ "John Quincy Adams: Campaigns and Elections". Miller Center of Public Affairs, University of Virginia. October 4, 2016. Retrieved March 28, 2017. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 33–34, 36–38 ^ a b c Kaplan 2014, pp. 391–393, 398. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 217. ^ "John Quincy Adams Takes the Oath of Office – Wearing Pants". New England Historical Society. March 4, 2015. Retrieved March 9, 2017. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 394–96. ^ Hargreaves 1985, p. 62–64 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 47–48 ^ Hargreaves 1985, p. 49–50 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 106–107. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 48–49 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 396–397. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 247–248 ^ First Annual Message; John Quincy Adams; speech transcript; (1825); via Peters, Gerhard and Woolley, John T.; The American Presidency Project online; University of California Santa Barbara; accessed January 2020 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 402–403. ^ Remini 2002, pp. 80–81. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 311–314 ^ a b Kaplan 2014, pp. 404–405. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 397–398. ^ a b Remini 2002, pp. 84–86. ^ Hargreaves 1985, p. 167 ^ Hargreaves 1985, p. 173 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 173–174 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 176–177 ^ Remini 2002, pp. 85–86. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 105–106. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 110–111. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 249–250 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 114–115. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 119–120. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 138–139. ^ Remini 2002, pp. 84–85. ^ Howe 2007, p. 251 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 125–126. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 146–147. ^ Remini 2002, pp. 110–111. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 127–128. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 279–280 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 141–142. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 189–191 ^ Remini, Robert V. (July 1958). "Martin Van Buren and the Tariff of Abominations". The American Historical Review. 63 (4): 903–917. doi:10.2307/1848947. JSTOR 1848947. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 157–158. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 225–226 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 398–400. ^ Howe 2007, p. 256 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 101–101 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 67–68 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 76–85 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 91–95 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 400–401. ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 102–107 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 110–112 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 240–241. ^ Howe 2007, p. 257 ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 401–402. ^ a b Remini 2002, pp. 82–83. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 229. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 408–410. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 275–277 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 152–154. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 142–143. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 143–144. ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 166–167. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 278–279 ^ Hargreaves 1985, pp. 283–284 ^ Parsons 2009, pp. 171–172. ^ a b Parsons 2009, pp. 181–183. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 281–283 ^ Howe 2007, pp. 276, 280–281 ^ Edel 2014, pp. 254–56. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 445–446. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 288–289, 345–346. ^ Edel 2014, pp. 258–59. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 450–52. ^ a b "John Quincy Adams: Impact and Legacy". Miller Center of Public Affairs, University of Virginia. October 4, 2016. Retrieved March 23, 2017. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 280–283. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 454, 458–59. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 286–287. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 458–64. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 298–299. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 300–303. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 309, 401. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 284–285. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 311–312. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 315. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 309–310. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 316. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 330. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 345–346. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 371–375. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 377–379. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 379–381. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 401–403. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 404–405. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 405–406. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 407–408. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 410. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 410–413. ^ Cooper 2017, p. 414. ^ Kaplan 2014, pp. 555–56. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 421–423. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 424–425. ^ a b Cooper 2017, pp. 430–431. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 323–324. ^ Parsons 1998, p. 224. ^ Miller 1996, p. 189. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 331–332. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 337–338. ^ Miller 1996, p. 270 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 354–356, 409. ^ Rodriguez, Junius, ed. (2007). Encyclopedia of Emancipation and Abolition in the Transatlantic World. M.E. Sharpe. pp. 9–11. ^ Teed, Paul E. (2006). John Quincy Adams : Yankee nationalist. New York: Nova Science Publishers. pp. 159–160. ISBN 9781594547973. ^ "Smithsonian Information Brochure", Smithsonian Visitor Information and Associates' Reception Center, May 2009 ^ "James Smithson: Biographical Information" (PDF). Smithsonian Institution. January 2008. Archived from the original (PDF) on March 4, 2016. Retrieved February 21, 2016. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 350–351. ^ "President John Q. Adams : Health & Medical History". Doctorzebra.com. Retrieved February 8, 2014. ^ Parker, Theodore (1848). A discourse occasioned by the death of John Quincy Adams. Boston: Published by Bela Marsh, 25 Cornhill. p. 26. OCLC 6354870. Retrieved August 2, 2009. ^ a b Donaldson, Norman and Betty (1980). How Did They Die?. Greenwich House. ISBN 0-517-40302-1. ^ Widmer, Edward L. (2008). Ark of the liberties: America and the world. New York: Hill and Wang. p. 120. ISBN 978-0-8090-2735-4. OCLC 191882004. Retrieved August 2, 2009. ^ "Quincy's Historic Hancock Cemetery". Quincy Historical Society. 2002. Retrieved July 11, 2018. ^ "Louisa Adams Biography: National First Ladies' Library". www.firstladies.org. Retrieved January 18, 2018. ^ "From Abigail Smith Adams to Thomas Boylston Adams, 12 July 1801". Adams Papers, Massachusetts Historical Society. Archived from the original on December 24, 2019. Retrieved January 13, 2020.CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown (link) [This is an Early Access document from The Adams Papers. It is not an authoritative final version.]. Also available from Internet Archive as archived on December 24, 2019. . ^ "Brief Biographies of Jackson Era Characters (A)". Jmisc.net. Retrieved September 16, 2008. ^ Shepherd, Jack, Cannibals of the Heart: A Personal Biography of Louisa Catherine and John Quincy Adams, New York, McGraw-Hill 1980 ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 264–265. ^ Cooper 2017, pp. 313–314. ^ "ADAMS, Charles Francis, (1807 - 1886)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. United States Congress. Retrieved October 4, 2018. ^ a b c d e Nagel 1999[page needed] ^ Hewson, Martha S.; Cronkite, Walter (January 1, 2009). John Quincy Adams – Google Knihy. ISBN 978-0-7910-7599-9. Retrieved November 4, 2018. ^ Digital History; Steven Mintz. "Digital History". Digitalhistory.uh.edu. Archived from the original on July 23, 2010. Retrieved April 20, 2010. ^ "John Quincy Adams Takes the Oath of Office – Wearing Pants". March 4, 2015. Retrieved November 4, 2018. ^ "Poindexter in Chief: Presidential IQs and Success in the Oval Office". U.S. News and World Report. ^ Simonton, Dean Keith (1986). "Presidential Greatness: The Historical Consensus and Its Psychological Significance". Political Psychology. 7 (2): 259–283. doi:10.2307/3791125. JSTOR 3791125. ^ Simonton, Dean Keith (August 2006). "Presidential IQ, Openness, Intellectual Brilliance, and Leadership: Estimates and Correlations for 42 U.S. Chief Executives" (PDF). Political Psychology. 27 (4): 511–526. doi:10.1111/j.1467-9221.2006.00524.x. ^ a b Cooper 2017, pp. xiii–xiv. ^ Herring, George (2008). From Colony to Superpower: U.S. Foreign Relations Since 1776. Oxford Univ. Press. p. 129. ^ "Historians Survey Results: John Quincy Adams". Presidential Historians Survey 2017. National Cable Satellite Corporation. 2017. Retrieved March 23, 2017. ^ Rottinghaus, Brandon; Vaughn, Justin S. (February 19, 2018). "How Does Trump Stack Up Against the Best — and Worst — Presidents?". New York Times. Retrieved May 14, 2018. ^ Howe 2007, pp. 244–245 ^ a b Mattie 2003 ^ Allitt, Patrick (2009). The Conservatives: Ideas and Personalities Throughout American History. Yale College. p. 22. ^ Viereck, Peter (2007). Shame and Glory of the Intellectuals. Transaction Publishers. p. 313. ^ Remini 2002, p. 22 ^ "House History: Adams House". Harvard University. Cambridge, Massachusetts: The President and Fellows of Harvard College. 2016. ^ Krainik, Clifford. "Face the Lens, Mr. President: A Gallery of Photographic Portraits of 19th-Century U.S. Presidents" (PDF). The White House Historical Association. Retrieved September 4, 2009. ^ "John Quincy Adams 1843 daguerreotype". National Portrait Gallery. August 21, 2015. Retrieved March 18, 2017. ^ Jeremy Stern (October 27, 2008). "What's Wrong with HBO's Dramatization of John Adams's Story". History News Network. Retrieved March 18, 2011. Works cited[edit] Abraham, Henry Julian (2008). Justices, Presidents, and Senators: A History of the U.S. Supreme Court Appointments from Washington to Bush II. Rowman & Littlefield. ISBN 9780742558953.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Allgor, Catherine (1997). "'A Republican in a Monarchy': Louisa Catherine Adams in Russia". Diplomatic History. 21 (1): 15–43. doi:10.1111/1467-7709.00049. ISSN 0145-2096. JSTOR 24913402.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Bemis, Samuel Flagg (1981) [1949]. John Quincy Adams and the Foundations of American Foreign Policy. Greenwood Press. ISBN 9780313226366.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Bemis, Samuel Flagg (1956). John Quincy Adams and the Union. Knopf. ISBN 978-0394414133.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Cooper, William J. (2017). The Lost Founding Father: John Quincy Adams and the Transformation of American Politics. Liveright Publishing. ISBN 9781631493898.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Edel, Charles N. (2014). Nation Builder: John Quincy Adams and the Grand Strategy of the Republic. Harvard Univ. Press.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Hargreaves, Mary W.M. (1985). The Presidency of John Quincy Adams. Univ. Press of Kansas.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Howe, Daniel Walker (2007). What Hath God Wrought: The Transformation of America, 1815–1848. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199743797.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Kaplan, Fred (2014). John Quincy Adams: American Visionary. HarperCollins. ISBN 9780062199324.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Lewis Jr, James E. John Quincy Adams: Policymaker for the Union (Rowman & Littlefield Publishers, 2001). Mattie, Sean (2003). "John Quincy Adams and American Conservatism" (PDF). Modern Age. 45 (4): 305–14. ISSN 0026-7457.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) McCullough, David (2001). John Adams. New York: Simon & Schuster. p. 144. ISBN 978-1-4165-7588-7.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Miller, William Lee (1996). Arguing About Slavery: The Great Battle in the United States Congress. Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN 9780394569222.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Nagel, Paul C. (1983). Descent from Glory: Four Generations of the John Adams Family. Oxford Univ. Press. ISBN 978-0-19-503172-0.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Nagel, Paul (1999). John Quincy Adams: A Public Life, a Private Life. Harvard Univ. Press. ISBN 978-0674479401.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Parsons, Lynn H. (2009). The Birth of Modern Politics: Andrew Jackson, John Quincy Adams, and the Election of 1828. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199837540.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) excerpt and text search Parsons, Lynn H. (1998). John Quincy Adams. Rowman and LittleField. ISBN 9781442202887.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Potkay, Adam S. (1999). "Theorizing Civic Eloquence in the Early Republic: the Road from David Hume to John Quincy Adams". Early American Literature. 34 (2): 147–70. ISSN 0012-8163. Rathbun, Lyon (2000). "The Ciceronian Rhetoric of John Quincy Adams". Rhetorica. 18 (2): 175–215. doi:10.1525/rh.2000.18.2.175. ISSN 0734-8584. Remini, Robert V. (2002). John Quincy Adams. New York: Times Books. ISBN 0-8050-6939-9.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Thompson, Robert R. (1991). "John Quincy Adams, Apostate: From "Outrageous Federalist" to "Republican Exile," 1801- 1809". Journal of the Early Republic. 11 (2): 161–183. doi:10.2307/3123239. JSTOR 3123239.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Traub, James (2016). John Quincy Adams: Militant Spirit. Basic Books. ISBN 9780465098798. Further reading[edit] Main article: Bibliography of John Quincy Adams Secondary sources[edit] Holt, Michael F. (1999). The Rise and Fall of the American Whig Party: Jacksonian Politics and the Onset of the Civil War. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199772032. McMillan, Richard (2001). "Election of 1824: Corrupt Bargain or the Birth of Modern Politics?". New England Journal of History. 58 (2): 24–37. Nagel, Paul C. (1983). Descent from Glory: Four Generations of the John Adams Family. New York: Oxford Univ. Press. ISBN 978-0-19-503172-0.CS1 maint: ref=harv (link) Parsons, Lynn Hudson (2003). "In Which the Political Becomes Personal, and Vice Versa: the Last Ten Years of John Quincy Adams and Andrew Jackson". Journal of the Early Republic. 23 (3): 421–43. doi:10.2307/3595046. ISSN 0275-1275. JSTOR 3595046. Pessen, Edward. "John Quincy Adams" in Henry Graff, ed. The Presidents: A Reference History (3rd ed. 2002) online Unger, Harlow Giles (2012). John Quincy Adams. Da Capo Press. ISBN 9780306821301. Waldstreicher, David (2013). A Companion to John Adams and John Quincy Adams. John Wiley & Sons. ISBN 9781118524299. excerpt and text search Wood, Gary V. (2004). Heir to the Fathers: John Quincy Adams and the Spirit of Constitutional Government. Ladham, Maryland: Lexington. ISBN 0-7391-0601-5. Primary sources[edit] Waldstreicher, David, ed. The Diaries of John Quincy Adams, 1779–1821 (Library of America, 20170. xiv, 727 pp) Adams, John Quincy (1874–1877). Adams, Charles Francis (ed.). Memoirs of John Quincy Adams: Comprising Portions of His Diary from 1795 to 1848. 12 v. Philadelphia: J.B. Lippincott & Co. ISBN 9780836950212. OCLC 559230698. Adams, John Quincy (1913–1917). Ford, Worthington C (ed.). Writings of John Quincy Adams. 7 v. New York: The Macmillan Company. OCLC 564019879. Butterfield, L. H.; Taylor, Robert J.; Ryerson, Richard A., eds. (1961). The Adams Papers. Cambridge, Mass: Belknap Press of Harvard University Press. OCLC 56354007. Founders Online, searchable edition External links[edit] Listen to this article (info/dl) This audio file was created from a revision of the article "John Quincy Adams" dated 2019-03-13, and does not reflect subsequent edits to the article. (Audio help) More spoken articles John Quincy Adamsat Wikipedia's sister projects Media from Wikimedia Commons Quotations from Wikiquote Texts from Wikisource Textbooks from Wikibooks Resources from Wikiversity White House biography John Quincy Adams at the Encyclopædia Britannica United States Congress. "John Quincy Adams (id: A000041)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. The Diaries of John Quincy Adams: A Digital Collection at the Massachusetts Historical Society "Life Portrait of John Quincy Adams", from C-SPAN's American Presidents: Life Portraits, April 18, 1999 Works by John Quincy Adams at Project Gutenberg Works by or about John Quincy Adams at Internet Archive Works by John Quincy Adams at LibriVox (public domain audiobooks) v t e John Quincy Adams United States House of Representatives, 1831–1848 6th President of the United States, 1825–1829 8th U.S. Secretary of State, 1817–1825 U.S. Ambassador to the United Kingdom, 1814–1817 1st U.S. Minister to Russia, 1809–1814 Massachusetts State Senate, 1803–1808 U.S. Minister to Prussia, 1797–1801 U.S. Ambassador to the Netherlands, 1794–1797 Presidency Inauguration American System Internal improvements Tariff of 1828 First Treaty of Prairie du Chien Treaty of Fond du Lac Treaty of Limits United States Naval Observatory Abdulrahman Ibrahim Ibn Sori State of the Union Address, 1825 1827 1828 Federal judiciary appointments Other events Monroe Doctrine, author Treaty of Ghent Adams–Onís Treaty Treaty of 1818 Smithsonian Institution United States v. The Amistad Mendi Bible President, American Academy of Arts and Sciences President, Columbian Institute for the Promotion of Arts and Sciences Writings Lifelong diary Massachusetts Historical Society holdings Adams Papers Editorial Project Life and homes Early life Abigail Adams Cairn John Quincy Adams and abolitionism Adams National Historical Park Birthplace and family home Peacefield Stone Library United First Parish Church and gravesite Elections 1824 United States presidential election Corrupt Bargain 1828 United States presidential election Legacy Adams Memorial Adams House at Harvard University U.S. Postage stamps Monroe Doctrine Centennial half dollar Popular culture Profiles in Courage (1957 book 1965 television series) The Adams Chronicles (1976 miniseries) Mutiny on the Amistad (1987 book) Amistad (1997 film) John Adams (2001 book 2008 miniseries) Adams family Quincy family Louisa Adams (wife) George W. Adams (son) Charles Adams Sr. (son) John Adams II (son) Henry Adams (grandson) Brooks Adams (grandson) John Quincy Adams II (grandson) John Adams father presidency Abigail Adams mother First Lady Quincy family Abigail Adams Smith (sister) Charles Adams (brother) Thomas Boylston Adams (brother) John Adams Sr. (paternal grandfather) Susanna Boylston (paternal grandmother) Elihu Adams (paternal uncle) John Quincy (great-grandfather) Related National Republican Party Republicanism Quincy Patriot ← James Monroe Andrew Jackson → Category Offices and distinctions Diplomatic posts Preceded by William Short United States Minister to the Netherlands 1794–1797 Succeeded by William Vans Murray New office United States Minister to Prussia 1797–1801 Vacant Title next held byHenry Wheaton Preceded by William Short United States Minister to Russia 1809–1814 Succeeded by James A. Bayard Vacant Title last held byJonathan Russell as Acting United States Minister to the United Kingdom United States Envoy to the United Kingdom 1815–1817 Succeeded by Richard Rush U.S. Senate Preceded by Jonathan Mason United States Senator (Class 1) from Massachusetts 1803–1808 Served alongside: Timothy Pickering Succeeded by James Lloyd Political offices Preceded by James Monroe United States Secretary of State 1817–1825 Succeeded by Henry Clay President of the United States 1825–1829 Succeeded by Andrew Jackson Party political offices Preceded by James Monroe Democratic-Republican nominee for President of the United States¹ 1824 Served alongside: Henry Clay, William H. Crawford, Andrew Jackson Party abolished New political party National Republican nominee for President of the United States 1828 Succeeded by Henry Clay Preceded by Samuel Lathrop Anti-Masonic nominee for Governor of Massachusetts 1833 Succeeded by John Bailey U.S. House of Representatives Preceded by Joseph Richardson Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Massachusetts's 11th congressional district 1831–1833 Succeeded by John Reed Jr. Preceded by James L. Hodges Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Massachusetts's 12th congressional district 1833–1843 Succeeded by George D. Robinson Preceded by William B. Calhoun Member of the U.S. House of Representatives from Massachusetts's 8th congressional district 1843–1848 Succeeded by Horace Mann Preceded by Rollin Mallary Chair of the House Manufactures Committee 1831–1847 Succeeded by Andrew Stewart Preceded by John Bell Chair of the House Indian Affairs Committee 1841–1843 Succeeded by Cave Johnson Preceded by Caleb Cushing Chair of the House Foreign Affairs Committee 1842–1843 Succeeded by Charles Jared Ingersoll Honorary titles Preceded by Dixon Hall Lewis Dean of the House 1844–1848 Served alongside: James Iver McKay Succeeded by James Iver McKay Preceded by Andrew Jackson Oldest living president of the United States 1845–1848 Succeeded by Martin Van Buren Notes and references 1. The Democratic-Republican Party split in the 1824 election, fielding four separate candidates. Articles related to John Quincy Adams v t e Presidents of the United States George Washington (1789–1797) John Adams (1797–1801) Thomas Jefferson (1801–1809) James Madison (1809–1817) James Monroe (1817–1825) John Quincy Adams (1825–1829) Andrew Jackson (1829–1837) Martin Van Buren (1837–1841) William Henry Harrison (1841) John Tyler (1841–1845) James K. Polk (1845–1849) Zachary Taylor (1849–1850) Millard Fillmore (1850–1853) Franklin Pierce (1853–1857) James Buchanan (1857–1861) Abraham Lincoln (1861–1865) Andrew Johnson (1865–1869) Ulysses S. Grant (1869–1877) Rutherford B. Hayes (1877–1881) James A. Garfield (1881) Chester A. Arthur (1881–1885) Grover Cleveland (1885–1889) Benjamin Harrison (1889–1893) Grover Cleveland (1893–1897) William McKinley (1897–1901) Theodore Roosevelt (1901–1909) William Howard Taft (1909–1913) Woodrow Wilson (1913–1921) Warren G. Harding (1921–1923) Calvin Coolidge (1923–1929) Herbert Hoover (1929–1933) Franklin D. Roosevelt (1933–1945) Harry S. Truman (1945–1953) Dwight D. Eisenhower (1953–1961) John F. Kennedy (1961–1963) Lyndon B. Johnson (1963–1969) Richard Nixon (1969–1974) Gerald Ford (1974–1977) Jimmy Carter (1977–1981) Ronald Reagan (1981–1989) George H. W. Bush (1989–1993) Bill Clinton (1993–2001) George W. Bush (2001–2009) Barack Obama (2009–2017) Donald Trump (2017–present) Presidency timelines T. Roosevelt Wilson Harding Coolidge Hoover F. D. Roosevelt Truman Eisenhower Kennedy L. B. Johnson Nixon Ford Carter Reagan G. H. W. Bush Clinton G. W. Bush Obama Trump Book Category List v t e Unsuccessful major party candidates for President of the United States Thomas Jefferson (1796) John Adams (1800) Charles C. Pinckney (1804, 1808) DeWitt Clinton (1812) Rufus King (1816) Andrew Jackson (1824) William H. Crawford (1824) Henry Clay (1824, 1832, 1844) John Quincy Adams (1828) William Henry Harrison (1836) Hugh Lawson White (1836) Martin Van Buren (1840) Lewis Cass (1848) Winfield Scott (1852) John C. Frémont (1856) Stephen A. Douglas (1860) George B. McClellan (1864) Horatio Seymour (1868) Horace Greeley (1872) Samuel J. Tilden (1876) Winfield Scott Hancock (1880) James G. Blaine (1884) Grover Cleveland (1888) Benjamin Harrison (1892) William J. Bryan (1896, 1900, 1908) Alton B. Parker (1904) William Howard Taft (1912) Charles Evans Hughes (1916) James M. Cox (1920) John W. Davis (1924) Al Smith (1928) Herbert Hoover (1932) Alf Landon (1936) Wendell Willkie (1940) Thomas E. Dewey (1944, 1948) Adlai Stevenson (1952, 1956) Richard Nixon (1960) Barry Goldwater (1964) Hubert Humphrey (1968) George McGovern (1972) Gerald Ford (1976) Jimmy Carter (1980) Walter Mondale (1984) Michael Dukakis (1988) George H. W. Bush (1992) Bob Dole (1996) Al Gore (2000) John Kerry (2004) John McCain (2008) Mitt Romney (2012) Hillary Clinton (2016) All presidential candidates Presidents Third party candidates v t e Democratic-Republican Party Anti-Administration Party First Party System Jeffersonian democracy Era of Good Feelings Presidency of Thomas Jefferson Presidency of James Madison Presidency of James Monroe Tertium quids Presidential tickets 1796: Thomas Jefferson/Aaron Burr 1800: Thomas Jefferson/Aaron Burr 1804: Thomas Jefferson/George Clinton 1808: James Madison/George Clinton 1812: James Madison/Elbridge Gerry 1816: James Monroe/Daniel D. Tompkins 1820: James Monroe/Daniel D. Tompkins 1824: John Quincy Adams/John C. Calhoun Andrew Jackson/John C. Calhoun William H. Crawford/Nathaniel Macon Henry Clay/Nathan Sanford U.S. House Speakers Frederick Muhlenberg (1793–1795) Nathaniel Macon (1801–1807) Joseph Bradley Varnum (1807–1811) Henry Clay (1811–1814) Langdon Cheves (1814–1815) Henry Clay (1815–1820) John W. Taylor (1820–1821) Philip Pendleton Barbour (1821–1823) Henry Clay (1823–1825) U.S. Cabinet State Thomas Jefferson (1790–1794) Levi Lincoln Sr. (1801) James Madison (1801–1809) Robert Smith (1809–1811) James Monroe (1811–1817) John Graham (1817) John Quincy Adams (1817–1825) Treasury Albert Gallatin (1801–1814) George W. Campbell (1814) Alexander J. Dallas (1814–1816) William Jones (1816) William H. Crawford (1816–1825) War Henry Dearborn (1801–1809) William Eustis (1809–1813) John Armstrong Jr. (1813–1814) James Monroe (1814–1815) Alexander J. Dallas (1815) William H. Crawford (1815–1816) George Graham (1816–1817) John C. Calhoun (1817–1825) Attorney General Levi Lincoln Sr. (1801–1805) John Breckinridge (1805–1806) Caesar Augustus Rodney (1807–1811) William Pinkney (1811–1814) William Wirt (1817–1825) Navy Robert Smith (1801–1809) Paul Hamilton (1809–1813) William Jones (1813–1814) Benjamin Williams Crowninshield (1815–1818) Smith Thompson (1819–1823) Samuel L. Southard (1823–1825) v t e National Republican and Whig Parties American System American Party Anti-Masonic Party Constitutional Union Party Second Party System Presidency of John Quincy Adams Presidency of William Henry Harrison Presidency of John Tyler Presidency of Zachary Taylor Presidency of Millard Fillmore Presidential tickets 1828 (None): John Quincy Adams/Richard Rush 1831 (Baltimore): Henry Clay/John Sergeant 1836 (None): William Henry Harrison/Francis Granger Hugh Lawson White/John Tyler Daniel Webster/Francis Granger Willie P. Mangum/John Tyler 1839 (Harrisburg): William Henry Harrison/John Tyler 1844 (Baltimore): Henry Clay/Theodore Frelinghuysen 1848 (Philadelphia): Zachary Taylor/Millard Fillmore 1852 (Baltimore): Winfield Scott/William A. Graham 1856 (Baltimore): Millard Fillmore/Andrew J. Donelson U.S. House Speakers John W. Taylor (1825–1827) Robert M. T. Hunter (1839–1841) John White (1841–1843) Robert C. Winthrop (1847–1849) U.S. Cabinet State Henry Clay (1825–1829) Daniel Webster (1841–1843) Abel P. Upshur (1843–1844) John M. Clayton (1849–1850) Daniel Webster (1850–1852) Edward Everett (1852–1853) Treasury Richard Rush (1825–1829) Thomas Ewing (1841) Walter Forward (1841–1843) John C. Spencer (1843–1844) George M. Bibb (1844–1845) William M. Meredith (1849–1850) Thomas Corwin (1850–1853) War James Barbour (1825–1828) Peter B. Porter (1828–1829) John Bell (1841) John C. Spencer (1841–1843) James M. Porter (1843–1844) George W. Crawford (1849–1850) Charles M. Conrad (1850–1853) Attorney General William Wirt (1825–1829) John J. Crittenden (1841) John Nelson (1843–1845) Reverdy Johnson (1849–1850) John J. Crittenden (1850–1853) Navy Samuel L. Southard (1825–1829) George E. Badger (1841) Abel P. Upshur (1841–1843) William B. Preston (1849–1850) William A. Graham (1850–1852) John P. Kennedy (1852–1853) Interior Thomas Ewing (1849–1850) Thomas M. T. McKennan (1850) Alexander H. H. Stuart (1850–1853) v t e United States Secretaries of State Secretary of Foreign Affairs 1781–89 R. Livingston Jay Secretary of State 1789–present Jefferson Randolph Pickering J. Marshall Madison Smith Monroe Adams Clay Van Buren E. Livingston McLane Forsyth Webster Upshur Calhoun Buchanan Clayton Webster Everett Marcy Cass Black Seward Washburne Fish Evarts Blaine Frelinghuysen Bayard Blaine Foster Gresham Olney Sherman Day Hay Root Bacon Knox Bryan Lansing Colby Hughes Kellogg Stimson Hull Stettinius Byrnes G. Marshall Acheson Dulles Herter Rusk Rogers Kissinger Vance Muskie Haig Shultz Baker Eagleburger Christopher Albright Powell Rice (tenure) Clinton (tenure) Kerry (tenure) Tillerson Pompeo v t e United States senators from Massachusetts Class 1 Dalton Cabot Goodhue Mason Adams Lloyd Gore Ashmun Mellen Mills Webster Choate Webster Winthrop Rantoul Sumner Washburn Dawes Lodge Sr. Butler Walsh Lodge J. Kennedy Smith E. Kennedy Kirk Brown Warren Class 2 Strong Sedgwick Dexter Foster Pickering Varnum Otis Lloyd Silsbee Davis Bates Davis Everett Rockwell Wilson Boutwell Hoar Crane J. Weeks Walsh Gillett Coolidge Lodge S. Weeks Saltonstall Brooke Tsongas Kerry Cowan Markey v t e Members of the U.S. House of Representatives from Massachusetts 1st district F. Ames Dexter Goodhue Holten Sedgwick Skinner Sedgwick J. Bacon Eustis Quincy Ward Jr. Mason Gorham Webster Gorham N. Appleton Gorham A. Lawrence Fletcher A. Lawrence Winthrop N. Appleton Winthrop S. Eliot W. Appleton Scudder T. D. Eliot Hall T. D. Eliot Buffington Crapo R. Davis Randall Wright G. Lawrence Treadway Heselton Conte Olver Neal 2nd district Goodhue Foster W. Lyman Sedgwick Ward Sr. W. Lyman Shepard J. Crowninshield Story Pickman W. Reed Pickering Silsbee Barstow B. Crowninshield Choate Phillips Saltonstall D. King Rantoul Fay Crocker Buffington O. Ames Harris Long E. Morse Gillett Churchill Bowles Kaynor Granfield Clason Furcolo Boland Neal McGovern 3rd district Gerry Bourne Coffin S. Lyman Mattoon Cutler Nelson Livermore White Pickering Nelson Varnum Nelson Osgood Cushing A. Abbott Duncan Edmands Damrell C. Adams Thomas A. Rice Twichell Whiting I Pierce Field B. Dean Field Ranney L. Morse J. Andrew Walker J. R. Thayer R. Hoar C. Washburn J. A. Thayer Wilder Paige F. Foss Casey Philbin Drinan Donohue Early Blute McGovern N. Tsongas Trahan 4th district Sedgwick Dearborn G. Thatcher Wadsworth Foster L. Lincoln Sr. Hastings Varnum W. Richardson Dana Stearns Fuller E. Everett Sa. Hoar Parmenter Thompson Palfrey Thompson Sabine Walley Comins A. Rice Hooper Frost J. Abbott L. Morse Collins O'Neil Apsley Weymouth Tirrell Mitchell Wilder Winslow Stobbs P. Holmes Donohue Drinan Frank Kennedy III 5th district Partridge Bourne Freeman L. Williams T. Dwight Ely Mills Lathrop Sibley J. Davis L. Lincoln Jr. Hudson C. Allen W. Appleton Burlingame W. Appleton Hooper Alley Butler Gooch Banks Bowman L. Morse Hayden Banks Sh. Hoar Stevens Knox B. Ames J. Rogers E. Rogers B. Morse Cronin P. Tsongas Shannon Atkins Meehan N. Tsongas Markey Clark 6th district G. Thatcher Leonard J. Reed Sr. J. Smith Taggart S. Allen Locke Kendall Grennell Alvord Baker Ashmun G. Davis Upham T. Davis Alley Gooch Banks Butler Thompson Loring Stone Lovering Lodge Cogswell Moody Gardner Lufkin A.P. Andrew G. Bates W. Bates Harrington Mavroules Torkildsen Tierney Moulton 7th district Leonard Ward Sr. Leonard Bullock Bishop Mitchell Barker Baylies Turner Baylies Hulbert Shaw H. Dwight S. Allen Grennell Briggs J. Rockwell Goodrich Banks Gooch Boutwell Brooks Esty E. Hoar Tarbox Butler W. Russell Stone Cogswell W. Everett Barrett Roberts Phelan Maloney W. Connery L. Connery Lane Macdonald Markey Capuano Pressley 8th district Grout G. Thatcher F. Ames Otis Eustis L. Williams Green Gardner Green J. Reed Jr. Baylies Sampson Hobart Lathrop Bates Calhoun J. Adams Mann Wentworth Knapp Train Baldwin G. Hoar J. M. S. Williams Warren Claflin Candler W Russell C. H. Allen Greenhalge Stevens McCall Deitrick Dallinger H. Thayer Dallinger Healey Goodwin Macdonald O'Neill Kennedy II Capuano Lynch 9th district Varnum Bishop J. Dean Wheaton J. Reed Jr. Folger J. Reed Jr. H. Dwight Briggs Jackson Hastings H. Williams Hale Fowler Little De Witt E. Thayer Bailey A. Walker W. Washburn Crocker G. Hoar W. Rice T. Lyman Ely Burnett Candler G. Williams O'Neil Fitzgerald Conry Keliher Murray Roberts Fuller Underhill Luce R. Russell Luce T. H. Eliot Gifford Nicholson Keith McCormack Hicks Moakley Lynch Keating 10th district Goodhue Sewall Read Hastings Upham J. Allen Brigham Wheaton Morton F Baylies Bailey H. A. S. Dearborn W. Baylies Borden H. Williams Borden Burnell Grinnell Scudder Dickinson Chaffee Delano Dawes Crocker Stevens Seelye Norcross W. Rice J. E. Russell J. Walker McEttrick Atwood Barrows Naphen McNary O'Connell Curley Murray Tague Fitzgerald Tague Douglass Tinkham Herter Curtis Martin Heckler Studds Delahunt Keating 11th district Bradbury Bartlett Cutler Stedman A. Bigelow Brigham B. Adams J. Russell Hobart J. Richardson J. Adams J. Reed Jr. Burnell Goodrich Trafton Dawes Chapin Robinson Whiting II Wallace Coolidge Draper Sprague Powers Sullivan Peters Tinkham Douglass Higgins Flaherty Curley Kennedy O'Neill Burke Donnelly 12th district H. Dearborn I. Parker Lee S. Thatcher Skinner Larned Bidwell Bacon Dewey Hulbert Strong Kendall L. Bigelow Baylies Hodges J. Adams Robinson F. Rockwell Crosby E. Morse Lovering Powers Weeks Curley Gallivan McCormack Keith Studds 13th district Wadsworth Seaver Ruggles Dowse Eustis J. Reed Jr. Randall Simpkins Greene Weeks Mitchell Carter Luce Wigglesworth Burke 14th district G. Thatcher Cutts C. King J. Holmes Lovering E. Foss Harris Gilmore Olney Frothingham Wigglesworth Martin 15th district Wadsworth Ilsley Whitman Widgery Bradbury Whitman Greene Leach Martin Gifford 16th district S. Thatcher Cook Tallman S. Davis Brown Orr Hill Thacher Walsh Gifford 17th district Bruce Chandler Gannett F. Carr Wood J. Carr Wilson Kinsley 18th district Wilson T. Rice J. Parker 19th district J. Parker Conner Gage Cushman 20th district Hubbard Parris E. Lincoln At-large Cobb v t e Ambassadors of the United States of America to the Court of St. James's Ministers Plenipotentiary to the Court of St. James's (1785–1811) J. Adams Pickney King Monroe Pinkney Russell (chargé d'affaires) Envoys Extraordinary and Ministers Plenipotentiary to the Court of St. James's (1815–1893) J. Q. Adams Rush King Gallatin Barbour McLane Van Buren Vail (chargé d'affaires) Stevenson Everett McLane Bancroft Lawrence Ingersoll Buchanan Dallas C. Adams R. Johnson Motley Schenck Pierrepont Welsh Lowell Phelps Lincoln Ambassadors Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary to the Court of St. James's (1893–present) Bayard Hay Choate Reid Page Davis Harvey Kellogg Houghton Dawes Mellon Bingham Kennedy Winant Harriman Douglas Gifford Aldrich Whitney Bruce Annenberg Richardson Armstrong Brewster Louis Price Catto Seitz Crowe Lader Farish Tuttle Susman Barzun W. Johnson v t e United States Ambassadors to Germany Minister Plenipotentiary Adams Envoy Extraordinary and Minister Plenipotentiary Wheaton Donelson Hannegan Barnard Vroom Wright Judd Wright Bancroft Davis Taylor White Sargent Kasson Pendleton Phelps Runyon Ambassador Extraordinary and Plenipotentiary Runyon Uhl White Tower Hill Leishman Gerard Dresel Houghton Schurman Sackett Dodd Wilson Kirk Morris Conant Bruce Dowling McGhee Lodge Rush Hillenbrand Stoessel Burns Burt Walters Kimmitt Holbrooke Redman Bindenagel Kornblum Coats Timken Koenig Murphy Emerson Logsdon Grenell v t e United States Ambassadors to the Netherlands J. Adams Short J. Q. Adams Vans Murray Eustis Everett Hughes Preble Davezac Bleecker Hughes Davezac Folsom Belmont Murphy Pike Rhodes Ewing Gorham Birney Dayton Bell Roosevelt Thayer Quinby Newel Hill Beaupre Bryce Van Dyke Garrett Phillips Tobin Diekema Swenson Emmet Gordon Biddle Hornbeck Baruch Chapin Matthews Young Rice Tyler Middendorf Gould McCloskey Joseph Dyess Bremer Shad Wilkins Dornbush Schneider Sobel Arnall Culbertson Hartog-Levin Broas Hoekstra v t e United States Ambassadors to Russia Russian Empire (1780–1917) Dana Adams Pinkney Campbell Middleton Randolph Buchanan Wilkins J. Clay Dallas Cambreleng Todd Ingersoll Bagby Brown Seymour Pickens Appleton C. Clay Cameron C. Clay Curtin Orr Jewell Boker Stoughton Foster Hunt Taft Lothrop Tree C. Smith White Breckinridge Hitchcock Tower McCormick Meyer Riddle Rockhill Guild Marye Francis Soviet Union (1933–1991) Bullitt Davies Steinhardt Standley Harriman W. Smith Kirk Kennan Bohlen Thompson Kohler Thompson Beam Dubs Stoessel Toon Watson Hartman Matlock Strauss Russian Federation (1991–present) Strauss Pickering Collins Vershbow Burns Beyrle McFaul Tefft Huntsman Sullivan v t e Chairmen of the United States House Committee on Foreign Affairs Russell Forsyth Everett Archer Wayne Mason Howard Pickens Cushing Adams Ingersoll T. Smith McClernand Bayly Pennington Clingman Hopkins Corwin Crittenden Davis Banks Myers Orth Swann Cox Williams Curtin Belmont McCreary Hitt Blount McCreary Hitt Cousins Perkins Foster Sulzer C. Smith Flood Porter Temple Linthicum McReynolds Bloom Eaton Bloom Kee Richards Chiperfield Richards Gordon Morgan Zablocki Fascell Hamilton Gilman Hyde Lantos Berman Ros-Lehtinen Royce Engel v t e Deans of the United States House of Representatives Muhlenberg Hartley/Thatcher Grove/Gregg/Macon Stanford Davenport Newton McCoy Williams Everett/Lewis Adams/McKay Boyd Giddings Phelps Washburne Dawes Kelley Randall Cannon/Mills/Blount/Bland Culberson Reed Bingham Dalzell Payne Jones Cooper/Gillett Butler Haugen Pou Sabath Doughton Rayburn Vinson Celler Patman Mahon Whitten Dingell Conyers Young v t e Cabinet of President James Monroe (1817–1825) Secretary of State John Quincy Adams (1817–1825) Secretary of the Treasury William H. Crawford (1817–1825) Secretary of War George Graham (1817) John C. Calhoun (1817–1825) Attorney General Richard Rush (1817) William Wirt (1817–1825) Postmaster General Return J. Meigs Jr. (1817–1823) John McLean (1823–1825) Secretary of the Navy Benjamin W. Crowninshield (1817–18) Smith Thompson (1819–1823) Samuel L. Southard (1823–1825) v t e Cabinet of President John Quincy Adams (1825–1829) Secretary of State Henry Clay (1825–1829) Secretary of the Treasury Richard Rush (1825–1829) Secretary of War James Barbour (1825–1828) Peter B. Porter (1828–29) Attorney General William Wirt (1825–1829) Postmaster General John McLean (1825–1829) Secretary of the Navy Samuel L. Southard (1825–1829) v t e Hall of Fame for Great Americans John Adams John Quincy Adams Jane Addams Louis Agassiz Susan B. Anthony John James Audubon George Bancroft Clara Barton Henry Ward Beecher Alexander Graham Bell Daniel Boone Edwin Booth Louis Brandeis Phillips Brooks William Cullen Bryant Luther Burbank Andrew Carnegie George Washington Carver William Ellery Channing Rufus Choate Henry Clay Grover Cleveland James Fenimore Cooper Peter Cooper Charlotte Cushman James Buchanan Eads Thomas Alva Edison Jonathan Edwards Ralph Waldo Emerson David Farragut Stephen Foster Benjamin Franklin Robert Fulton Josiah W. Gibbs William C. Gorgas Ulysses S. Grant Asa Gray Alexander Hamilton Nathaniel Hawthorne Joseph Henry Patrick Henry Oliver Wendell Holmes Sr. Oliver Wendell Holmes Jr. Mark Hopkins Elias Howe Washington Irving Andrew Jackson Thomas J. Jackson Thomas Jefferson John Paul Jones James Kent Sidney Lanier Robert E. Lee Abraham Lincoln Henry Wadsworth Longfellow James Russell Lowell Mary Lyon Edward MacDowell James Madison Horace Mann John Marshall Matthew Fontaine Maury Albert A. Michelson Maria Mitchell James Monroe Samuel F. B. Morse William T. G. Morton John Lothrop Motley Simon Newcomb Thomas Paine Alice Freeman Palmer Francis Parkman George Peabody William Penn Edgar Allan Poe Walter Reed Franklin D. Roosevelt Theodore Roosevelt Augustus Saint-Gaudens William Tecumseh Sherman John Philip Sousa Joseph Story Harriet Beecher Stowe Gilbert Stuart Sylvanus Thayer Henry David Thoreau Mark Twain Lillian Wald Booker T. Washington George Washington Daniel Webster George Westinghouse James McNeill Whistler Walt Whitman Eli Whitney John Greenleaf Whittier Emma Willard Frances E. Willard Roger Williams Woodrow Wilson Orville Wright Wilbur Wright v t e John Adams 2nd President of the United States, 1797–1801 1st Vice President of the United States, 1789–1797 U.S. Ambassador to the United Kingdom, 1785–1788 U.S. Ambassador to the Netherlands, 1782–1788 Delegate, Second Continental Congress, 1775–1778 Delegate, First Continental Congress, 1774 Founding of the United States Braintree Instructions (1765) Boston Massacre defense Continental Association Novanglus; A History of the Dispute with America, From Its Origin in 1754 to the Present Time (1775) Thoughts on Government (1776) Declaration of Independence May 15 preamble Committee of Five Model Treaty Treaty of Amity and Commerce Treaty of Alliance Board of War Chairman of the Marine Committee, 1775-1779 Continental Navy Staten Island Peace Conference Conference House Constitution of Massachusetts (1780) Treaty of Paris, 1783 Elections United States presidential election 1788–1789 1792 1796 1800 Presidency Inauguration Quasi War with France XYZ Affair Commerce Protection Act United States Marine Corps Convention of 1800 Alien and Sedition Acts Naturalization Act of 1798 Navy Department Library Treaty of Tellico Treaty of Tripoli Midnight Judges Act Marbury v. Madison State of the Union Address (1797 1798 1799 1800) Cabinet Federal judiciary appointments Other writings Massachusetts Historical Society holdings Adams Papers Editorial Project Life and homes Early life and education Adams National Historical Park John Adams Birthplace Family home and John Quincy Adams birthplace Peacefield Stone Library Massachusetts Hall, Harvard University Presidents House, Philadelphia Co-founder and second president, American Academy of Arts and Sciences United First Parish Church and gravesite Legacy Adams Memorial John Adams Building Jefferson Memorial pediment U.S. Postage stamps Treaty of Paris (1783 painting) Adams House at Harvard University Mount Adams Popular culture Profiles in Courage (1964 series) American Primitive (1969 play) 1776 (1969 musical 1972 film) The Adams Chronicles (1976 miniseries) Liberty! (1997 documentary series) Liberty's Kids (2002 animated series) John Adams (2001 book 2008 miniseries) Sons of Liberty (2015 miniseries) Related "Adams and Liberty" campaign song Adams' personal library American Enlightenment Congress Hall Federalist Party Federalist Era First Party System republicanism American Philosophical Society Gazette of the United States The American Museum American Revolution patriots Family Abigail Adams wife Quincy family Abigail Adams Smith (daughter) John Quincy Adams son presidency Charles Adams (son) Thomas Boylston Adams (son) George W. Adams (grandson) Charles Adams Sr. (grandson) John Adams II (grandson) John Q. Adams (great-grandson) Henry Adams (great-grandson) Brooks Adams (great-grandson) John Adams Sr. (father) Susanna Boylston (mother) Elihu Adams (brother) Samuel Adams (second cousin) Louisa Adams daughter-in-law First Lady ← George Washington Thomas Jefferson → Category Biography portal United States portal Politics portal Law portal Authority control BNE: XX1572157 BNF: cb12284310j (data) CANTIC: a11177378 GND: 118643789 ISNI: 0000 0001 2128 2017 LCCN: n79140988 NARA: 10583041 NKC: jn20011211222 NLA: 36311662 NLI: 000602218 NTA: 068423020 SELIBR: 206577 SNAC: w6s0026g SUDOC: 027551482 Trove: 1245086 ULAN: 500353262 US Congress: A000041 VIAF: 36980021 WorldCat Identities: lccn-n79140988 Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_Quincy_Adams&oldid=953591732" Categories: John Quincy Adams 1767 births 1848 deaths 18th-century American politicians 18th-century Unitarians 19th-century American politicians 19th-century Unitarians 19th-century Presidents of the United States Adams political family Ambassadors of the United States to Prussia Ambassadors of the United States to Russia Ambassadors of the United States to the Netherlands Ambassadors of the United States to the United Kingdom American abolitionists American expatriates in the Dutch Republic American people of English descent American Unitarians Anti-Masonic Party members of the United States House of Representatives from Massachusetts Burials in Massachusetts Children of Presidents of the United States Deaths from cerebrovascular disease Democratic-Republican Party Presidents of the United States Federalist Party United States senators Fellows of the American Academy of Arts and Sciences George Washington University trustees Hall of Fame for Great Americans inductees Harvard College alumni Harvard University faculty Leiden University alumni Massachusetts Democratic-Republicans Massachusetts Federalists Massachusetts lawyers Massachusetts National Republicans Massachusetts state senators Massachusetts Whigs Members of the American Antiquarian Society Members of the American Philosophical Society Members of the United States House of Representatives from Massachusetts Monroe administration cabinet members National Republican Party members of the United States House of Representatives Politicians from Braintree, Massachusetts Politicians from Quincy, Massachusetts Presidency of John Quincy Adams Presidents of the United States Quincy family Candidates in the 1820 United States presidential election Candidates in the 1824 United States presidential election Candidates in the 1828 United States presidential election United States Secretaries of State United States senators from Massachusetts Whig Party members of the United States House of Representatives American lawyers admitted to the practice of law by reading law American political party founders Deans of the United States House of Representatives Hidden categories: CS1 maint: BOT: original-url status unknown Wikipedia articles needing page number citations from January 2018 Wikipedia pending changes protected pages Use mdy dates from February 2020 Articles with short description Pages using infobox officeholder with ambassador from or minister from Articles with hAudio microformats Pages including recorded pronunciations Wikipedia articles needing page number citations from October 2018 CS1 maint: ref=harv Spoken articles Articles with Encyclopædia Britannica links Articles with Project Gutenberg links Articles with Internet Archive links Articles with LibriVox links Wikipedia articles with BNE identifiers Wikipedia articles with BNF identifiers Wikipedia articles with CANTIC identifiers Wikipedia articles with GND identifiers Wikipedia articles with ISNI identifiers Wikipedia articles with LCCN identifiers Wikipedia articles with NARA identifiers Wikipedia articles with NKC identifiers Wikipedia articles with NLA identifiers Wikipedia articles with NLI identifiers Wikipedia articles with NTA identifiers Wikipedia articles with SELIBR identifiers Wikipedia articles with SNAC-ID identifiers Wikipedia articles with SUDOC identifiers Wikipedia articles with Trove identifiers Wikipedia articles with ULAN identifiers Wikipedia articles with USCongress identifiers Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiers Wikipedia articles with WorldCat identifiers Navigation menu Personal tools Not logged in Talk Contributions Create account Log in Namespaces Article Talk Variants Views Read Edit View history More Search Navigation Main page Contents Featured content Current events Random article Donate to Wikipedia Wikipedia store Interaction Help About Wikipedia Community portal Recent changes Contact page Tools What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Wikidata item Cite this page In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikiquote Wikisource Print/export Create a book Download as PDF Printable version Languages Afrikaans አማርኛ Ænglisc العربية Aragonés Asturianu Aymar aru Azərbaycanca تۆرکجه বাংলা Bân-lâm-gú Беларуская Беларуская (тарашкевіца)‎ Bikol Central Bislama Български Bosanski Brezhoneg Català Чӑвашла Cebuano Čeština Corsu Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch ދިވެހިބަސް Eesti Ελληνικά Español Esperanto Euskara فارسی Français Gaeilge Gaelg Gàidhlig Galego 客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî 한국어 Հայերեն हिन्दी Hrvatski Ido Ilokano Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua Íslenska Italiano עברית Jawa Kapampangan ქართული Қазақша Kernowek Kinyarwanda Kiswahili Kreyòl ayisyen Kurdî Latina Latviešu Lëtzebuergesch Lietuvių Lingua Franca Nova Lumbaart Magyar Македонски Malagasy മലയാളം मराठी მარგალური مصرى مازِرونی Bahasa Melayu Mìng-dĕ̤ng-ngṳ̄ မြန်မာဘာသာ Nederlands नेपाली 日本語 Norsk bokmål Norsk nynorsk Occitan ਪੰਜਾਬੀ پنجابی Piemontèis Plattdüütsch Polski Português Ripoarisch Română Runa Simi Русский Scots Shqip Sicilianu Simple English Slovenčina Slovenščina Српски / srpski Srpskohrvatski / српскохрватски Suomi Svenska Tagalog தமிழ் Татарча/tatarça ไทย Türkçe Türkmençe Українська اردو Tiếng Việt 文言 Winaray 吴语 ייִדיש Yorùbá 粵語 中文 Edit links This page was last edited on 28 April 2020, at 01:08 (UTC). Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License; additional terms may apply. By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view